






























Evanson Asset Management LLC Sells 131 Shares of Procter & Gamble Company (The) (NYSE:PG) - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Procter & Gamble Company (The)

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Procter & Gamble Company (The) with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

NRG Energy, Inc. (NRG) Shares Sold by Russell Investments Group Ltd.
Preferred Apartment Communities Inc. (APTS) Shares Sold by Russell Investments Group Ltd.
Russell Investments Group Ltd. Has $1.11 Million Stake in Inventure Foods, Inc. (SNAK)
Alexandria Capital LLC Boosts Stake in Wells Fargo & Company (WFC)
Dock Street Asset Management Inc. Boosts Position in Amazon.com, Inc. (AMZN)
TESARO, Inc. (TSRO) Given Buy Rating at Bank of America Corporation
WealthTrust Arizona LLC Cuts Position in J P Morgan Chase & Co (NYSE:JPM)
Evanson Asset Management LLC Sells 131 Shares of Procter & Gamble Company (The) (NYSE:PG)
Research Analysts Offer Predictions for American Software, Inc.’s Q1 2018 Earnings (AMSWA)
Zacks Investment Research Upgrades Metso Oyj (MXCYY) to “Buy”
Teachers Advisors LLC Maintains Position in Eclipse Resources Corporation (NYSE:ECR)
Q2 2018 EPS Estimates for Resource Capital Corp. Lowered by FBR & Co (NYSE:RSO)
Critical Contrast: Sparton Corporation (SPA) and Coherent (NASDAQ:COHR)
Stratasys, Ltd. (NASDAQ:SSYS) Cut to “Hold” at Zacks Investment Research
Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. (CMG) Earns “Neutral” Rating from BTIG Research
Santander Consumer USA Holdings Inc. (SC) Receives Buy Rating from Jefferies Group LLC
Deutsche Bank AG Reaffirms “Buy” Rating for RealPage, Inc. (NASDAQ:RP)
Ranger Global Real Estate Advisors LLC Has $16.71 Million Position in Corrections Corp. of America (CXW)
Viking Fund Management LLC Raises Stake in Callon Petroleum Company (NYSE:CPE)
Freightcar America, Inc. (NASDAQ:RAIL) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Research







Evanson Asset Management LLC Sells 131 Shares of Procter & Gamble Company (The) (NYSE:PG)


					Posted by Harper Lund on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments




Evanson Asset Management LLC cut its position in  Procter & Gamble Company (The) (NYSE:PG) by 1.9% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund owned 6,835 shares of the company’s stock after selling 131 shares during the period. Evanson Asset Management LLC’s holdings in Procter & Gamble Company (The) were worth $614,000 as of its most recent filing with the SEC. 
Several other hedge funds have also recently bought and sold shares of PG. Norges Bank acquired a new position in shares of  Procter & Gamble Company (The) during the fourth quarter worth $1,918,188,000.  Asset Management One Co. Ltd. increased its position in shares of  Procter & Gamble Company (The) by 775.6% in the fourth quarter. Asset Management One Co. Ltd. now owns 4,562,545 shares of the company’s stock worth $383,723,000 after buying an additional 4,041,486 shares in the last quarter.  DZ BANK AG Deutsche Zentral Genossenschafts Bank Frankfurt am Main purchased a new stake in  Procter & Gamble Company (The) during the fourth quarter worth about $127,893,000.  Equity Investment Corp Acquisition Inc purchased a new stake in  Procter & Gamble Company (The) during the fourth quarter worth about $105,370,000.  Finally, State Street Corp boosted its stake in  Procter & Gamble Company (The) by 0.9% in the fourth quarter. State Street Corp now owns 117,814,233 shares of the company’s stock worth $9,905,824,000 after buying an additional 1,102,516 shares during the last quarter. 59.81% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors. 


 Get Procter & Gamble Company (The) alerts:



Procter & Gamble Company (NYSE PG) traded down 0.119% during mid-day trading on Friday, hitting $88.495. 4,669,861 shares of the company were exchanged. The company’s 50-day moving average is $88.25 and its 200 day moving average is $88.33. The company has a market capitalization of $226.34 billion, a P/E ratio of 16.270 and a beta of 0.68. Procter & Gamble Company has a 12-month low of $81.18 and a 12-month high of $92.00.  Procter & Gamble Company (The) also saw unusually large options trading activity on Tuesday. Stock investors bought  17,404 call options on the company. This represents an increase of approximately 369% compared to the average volume of 3,714 call options.





Procter & Gamble Company (The) (NYSE:PG) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Wednesday, April 26th. The company reported $0.96 EPS for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.94 by $0.02. The company had revenue of $15.61 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $15.70 billion. Procter & Gamble Company (The) had a net margin of 23.14% and a return on equity of 19.30%. Procter & Gamble Company (The)’s revenue was down 1.0% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the previous year, the business earned $0.86 earnings per share.  Analysts expect that  Procter & Gamble Company will post $3.85 EPS for the current year. 
The company also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Tuesday, August 15th. Investors of record on Friday, July 21st will be issued a $0.6896 dividend. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, July 19th. This represents a $2.76 annualized dividend and a yield of 3.11%. Procter & Gamble Company (The)’s payout ratio is 50.55%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: This story was first  posted by Chaffey Breeze and is owned by of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this story on another domain, it was copied illegally and reposted in violation of US and international copyright and trademark laws. The correct version of this story can be accessed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/21/procter-gamble-company-the-pg-position-reduced-by-evanson-asset-management-llc-updated-updated-updated.html. 
Several research firms recently weighed in on PG. UBS AG  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $101.00 price objective on shares of Procter & Gamble Company (The) in a research report on Thursday, March 23rd. BidaskClub cut Procter & Gamble Company (The) from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Wednesday, July 12th. Jefferies Group LLC  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $98.00 price objective on shares of Procter & Gamble Company (The) in a research report on Monday. Royal Bank Of Canada  restated a “hold” rating and set a $80.00 price target on shares of Procter & Gamble Company (The) in a research note on Friday, June 30th. Finally, Vetr lowered Procter & Gamble Company (The) from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating and set a $83.75 price objective on the stock. in a research note on Monday, July 3rd. Four analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, ten have given a hold rating and seven have given a buy rating to the company. The stock presently has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $87.04.
In related news, insider Patrice Louvet sold 3,837 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction on Thursday, May 4th. The shares were sold at an average price of $87.00, for a total value of $333,819.00. Following the transaction, the insider now owns 46,913 shares in the company, valued at $4,081,431. The transaction was disclosed in a document filed with the SEC, which is available through this link. Also, insider Steven D. Bishop sold 2,668 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction on Monday, May 1st. The shares were sold at an average price of $87.34, for a total transaction of $233,023.12. Following the completion of the transaction, the insider now owns 43,608 shares in the company, valued at approximately $3,808,722.72. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. In the last 90 days, insiders sold 199,891 shares of company stock worth $17,276,637. 0.35% of the stock is owned by company insiders. 
Procter & Gamble Company (The) Company Profile
The Procter & Gamble Company is focused on providing branded consumer packaged goods to the consumers across the world. The Company operates through five segments: Beauty; Grooming; Health Care; Fabric & Home Care, and Baby, Feminine & Family Care. The Company sells its products in approximately 180 countries and territories primarily through mass merchandisers, grocery stores, membership club stores, drug stores, department stores, distributors, baby stores, specialty beauty stores, e-commerce, high-frequency stores and pharmacies.







Receive News & Ratings for Procter & Gamble Company (The) Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Procter & Gamble Company (The) and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 















































Evanson Asset Management, LLC: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 12:59 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Evanson Asset Management, LLC



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Evanson Asset Management, LLC is an employee owned investment manager. It provides its services to individuals and their families, including high net worth individuals, and trusts. The firm manages separate client-focused portfolios. It invests in public equity, fixed income, and alternative investment markets across the globe. For its alternative investments, the firm invests in gold and commodities. It also invests in no-load stock and bond mutual funds which are passively managed. The firm obtains external research to make its investments. Evanson Asset Management, LLC was founded in 1995 and is based in Carmel, California.


3483 Greenfield PlaceCarmel, CA 93923United StatesFounded in 1995



Phone: 800-624-1015

Fax: 831-333-2063

www.evansonasset.com







Key Executives for Evanson Asset Management, LLC




Dr. Steven Edward Evanson Ph.D.


      	Founder, Chief Executive Officer, and Chief Compliance Officer
      


Age: 71
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Evanson Asset Management, LLC, please visit www.evansonasset.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


























﻿




























Evanson Asset Management LLC Has $203,000 Stake in Enbridge Inc (ENB) - StockNewsTimes














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings & News for Enbridge Inc
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Enbridge Inc with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @StockNewTimes









Recent Posts

Financial Analysis: World Wrestling Entertainment (NYSE:WWE) and DTS (DTSI)
Critical Contrast: CIRCOR International (CIR) and Tesco Corporation (NASDAQ:TESO)
Zions Bancorporation to Post FY2017 Earnings of $2.86 Per Share, FBR & Co Forecasts (ZION)
FY2017 Earnings Estimate for Smith (A.O.) Corporation (NYSE:AOS) Issued By Northcoast Research
Semtech Corporation (NASDAQ:SMTC) Receives Consensus Recommendation of “Buy” from Analysts
Cervus Equipment Corp (CERV) Given Consensus Recommendation of “Hold” by Analysts
FY2017 EPS Estimates for Rockwell Automation, Inc. (NYSE:ROK) Increased by Oppenheimer Holdings
Capital City Bank Group (NASDAQ:CCBG) Lowered to “Strong Sell” at BidaskClub
BidaskClub Lowers Capital Trust, Inc. (NYSE:BXMT) to Hold
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce (NYSE:CM) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub
BidaskClub Lowers Copa Holdings, S.A. (NYSE:CPA) to Buy
Citrix Systems, Inc. (NASDAQ:CTXS) Lowered to “Sell” at BidaskClub
Darling Ingredients Inc. (NYSE:DAR) Downgraded to Buy at BidaskClub
China HGS Real Estate (HGSH) Receiving Favorable Press Coverage, Study Finds
Somewhat Positive News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Biolase (BIOL) Stock Price
S&W Seed (SANW) Earns News Sentiment Rating of 0.07
Somewhat Favorable News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Norsat International (NSAT) Share Price
Babcock (BW) Downgraded by BidaskClub
AxoGen, Inc. (AXGN) Downgraded by BidaskClub to Buy
On Assignment, Inc. (ASGN) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub



 


Evanson Asset Management LLC Has $203,000 Stake in Enbridge Inc (ENB)

					Posted by Andrew Steele on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 



Evanson Asset Management LLC decreased its position in  Enbridge Inc (NYSE:ENB) (TSE:ENB) by 3.9% during the second quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional investor  owned 5,092 shares of the pipeline company’s stock after selling 206 shares during the period. Evanson Asset Management LLC’s holdings in Enbridge were worth $203,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
A number of other large investors also recently modified their holdings of ENB. DORCHESTER WEALTH MANAGEMENT Co increased its stake in shares of  Enbridge by 0.4% in the first quarter. DORCHESTER WEALTH MANAGEMENT Co now owns 35,126 shares of the pipeline company’s stock worth $1,470,000 after buying an additional 126 shares in the last quarter.  Capital Asset Advisory Services LLC increased its stake in shares of  Enbridge by 2.2% in the first quarter. Capital Asset Advisory Services LLC now owns 6,741 shares of the pipeline company’s stock worth $282,000 after buying an additional 143 shares in the last quarter.  Bluestein R H & Co. increased its stake in shares of  Enbridge by 1.3% in the first quarter. Bluestein R H & Co. now owns 15,196 shares of the pipeline company’s stock worth $636,000 after buying an additional 196 shares in the last quarter.  Atwood & Palmer Inc. increased its stake in shares of  Enbridge by 8.8% in the first quarter. Atwood & Palmer Inc. now owns 2,721 shares of the pipeline company’s stock worth $114,000 after buying an additional 221 shares in the last quarter.  Finally, First PREMIER Bank increased its stake in shares of  Enbridge by 0.8% in the second quarter. First PREMIER Bank now owns 42,470 shares of the pipeline company’s stock worth $1,690,000 after buying an additional 351 shares in the last quarter. 62.95% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get Enbridge Inc alerts:



Enbridge Inc (NYSE:ENB) opened at 41.90 on Friday. The company has a market capitalization of $68.67 billion, a PE ratio of 44.43 and a beta of 0.61. The stock has a 50 day moving average price of $39.46 and a 200-day moving average price of $41.16. Enbridge Inc has a 52 week low of $37.37 and a 52 week high of $45.77. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: This piece was originally  posted by StockNewsTimes and is the property of of StockNewsTimes. If you are viewing this piece on another domain, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of United States & international trademark & copyright legislation. The correct version of this piece can be accessed at https://stocknewstimes.com/2017/07/21/evanson-asset-management-llc-has-203000-stake-in-enbridge-inc-enb.html. 




A number of brokerages have weighed in on ENB. Wells Fargo & Company  reaffirmed a “market perform” rating on shares of Enbridge in a report on Friday, March 31st. Morgan Stanley  reaffirmed an “equal weight” rating and issued a $44.00 target price (down previously from $45.00) on shares of Enbridge in a report on Friday, July 14th. BidaskClub raised Enbridge from a “strong sell” rating to a “sell” rating in a report on Saturday, June 24th. J P Morgan Chase & Co  reaffirmed a “neutral” rating on shares of Enbridge in a report on Friday, June 23rd. Finally, Zacks Investment Research downgraded Enbridge from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report on Tuesday, July 11th. Two equities research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, six have issued  a hold rating and eight have issued  a buy rating to the company. Enbridge currently has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $54.00.
Enbridge Company Profile
Enbridge Inc is a Canada-based energy transportation and distribution company. The Company is engaged in delivering energy. It operates through five segments: Liquids Pipelines, Gas Distribution, Gas Pipelines and Processing, Green Power and Transmission, and Energy Services. Liquids Pipelines consists of common carrier and contract crude oil, natural gas liquids (NGL), and refined products pipelines and terminals, including Canadian Mainline, Lakehead Pipeline System, Mid-Continent and Gulf Coast and Regional Oil Sands System.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding ENB? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Enbridge Inc (NYSE:ENB) (TSE:ENB).







Receive News & Ratings for Enbridge Inc Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Enbridge Inc and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 












































Evanson Asset Management LLC: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback
























evanson asset management llc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Management
Evanson Asset Management, LLC (EAM) operates as an investment management firm. The Company offers portfolio management and investment advisory services. EAM serves customers in the States of California and Virginia.




Corporate Information
Address:

3483 Greenfield Place
Carmel, CA 93923
United States


Phone:
1-831-333-2060


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.evansonasset.com























From The Web











Key Executives


Steven E Evanson


CEO/CEO/Mng Member







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data





































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















						  Evanson Asset Management Cut Microsoft (MSFT) Holding By $323,020, Open Text (OTEX) Shorts Increased By 4.37%								







 


 
























 


























Stock News
Market News
Trending Stock News
Penny Stock News






Evanson Asset Management Cut Microsoft (MSFT) Holding By $323,020, Open Text (OTEX) Shorts Increased By 4.37%

July 25, 2017 - By Peter Erickson

Evanson Asset Management Llc decreased Microsoft Corp (MSFT) stake by 20.81% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing. Evanson Asset Management Llc sold 5,210 shares as Microsoft Corp (MSFT)’s stock rose 4.75%. The Evanson Asset Management Llc holds 19,827 shares with $1.23M value, down from 25,037 last quarter. Microsoft Corp now has $568.38 billion valuation. The stock rose 0.29% or $0.21 reaching $73.81. About 7.40 million shares traded. Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT) has risen 34.52% since July 25, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 17.82% the S&P500.
 Open Text Corporation (NASDAQ:OTEX) had an increase of 4.37% in short interest. OTEX’s SI was 7.48 million shares in July as released by FINRA. Its up 4.37% from 7.16 million shares previously. With 474,700 avg volume, 16 days are for Open Text Corporation (NASDAQ:OTEX)’s short sellers to cover OTEX’s short positions. The SI to Open Text Corporation’s float is 2.91%. About 75,995 shares traded. Open Text Corp (USA) (NASDAQ:OTEX) has risen 15.94% since July 25, 2016 and is uptrending. It has underperformed by 0.76% the S&P500.







Open Text Corporation provides a platform and suite of software services and products that assist organizations in finding, utilizing, and sharing business information from any device. The company has market cap of $8.83 billion. The Firm designs, develops, markets and sells Enterprise Information Management software and solutions. It has a 7.66 P/E ratio. The Company’s EIM offerings include Enterprise Content Management (ECM), Business Process Management (BPM), Customer Experience Management (CEM), Business Network, Discovery and Analytics.
Among 7 analysts covering OpenText Corporation (NASDAQ:OTEX), 6 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 1 Hold. Therefore 86% are positive. OpenText Corporation had 13 analyst reports since July 30, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. Citigroup initiated the stock with “Neutral” rating in Thursday, February 16 report. Barclays Capital reinitiated Open Text Corp (USA) (NASDAQ:OTEX) rating on Tuesday, January 24. Barclays Capital has “Overweight” rating and $76 target. The rating was upgraded by RBC Capital Markets to “Outperform” on Thursday, July 30. The firm has “Buy” rating by RBC Capital Markets given on Wednesday, July 12. The stock of Open Text Corp (USA) (NASDAQ:OTEX) earned “Overweight” rating by Barclays Capital on Thursday, October 29. The rating was upgraded by BMO Capital Markets on Tuesday, September 13 to “Outperform”. TD Securities initiated Open Text Corp (USA) (NASDAQ:OTEX) on Monday, April 4 with “Buy” rating. As per Tuesday, July 28, the company rating was maintained by Barclays Capital.
Evanson Asset Management Llc increased Facebook Inc (NASDAQ:FB) stake by 37,373 shares to 416,348 valued at $47.90 million in 2016Q4. It also upped Cisco Sys Inc (NASDAQ:CSCO) stake by 12,925 shares and now owns 121,944 shares. Sprott Physical Gold Trust (PHYS) was raised too. 
Investors sentiment increased to 0.95 in Q4 2016. Its up 0.11, from 0.84 in 2016Q3. It improved, as 49 investors sold MSFT shares while 897 reduced holdings. 155 funds opened positions while 739 raised stakes. 5.51 billion shares or 2.12% more from 5.39 billion shares in 2016Q3 were reported. Smith Asset Mgmt Gp Limited Partnership reported 1.55% of its portfolio in Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT). Middleton Ma holds 1.92% or 136,959 shares. Mitchell Capital Mngmt owns 4,303 shares or 0.1% of their US portfolio. 1.26M were reported by Bradley Foster Sargent Ct. Page Arthur B invested 3.05% of its portfolio in Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT). Baker Boyer National Bank invested in 15,919 shares. Friess Ltd has 0.01% invested in Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT) for 1,875 shares. Campbell Newman Asset Mgmt owns 4.74% invested in Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT) for 397,718 shares. Farmers Trust Communication reported 152,130 shares. Milestone Grp holds 0.24% or 25,015 shares in its portfolio. Anderson Hoagland And holds 2.83% or 78,132 shares. Rfg Advisory Limited Liability Company invested in 0.16% or 4,496 shares. Dixon Hubard Feinour & Brown Va invested in 2.32% or 117,574 shares. 10 reported 31,595 shares. Wall Street Access Asset Mngmt Limited Liability reported 4.01% in Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT).


Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our FREE daily email newsletter.












 




Free Email Newsletter Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our free daily email newsletter:






  Recent Posts 

Endicott Management Company Upped By $918,000 Its Harris Del (HRS) Holding; Trexquant Investment LP Lifted By $505,690 Its Calavo Growers (CVGW) Position


Causeway Capital Management Has Increased Posco (PKX) Holding By $1.03 Million, Blackrock Corporate High Yield Fund III (HYT)’s Sentiment Is 0.86


Trustmark National Bank Trust Department Has Trimmed Its Lincoln National (LNC) Stake, Parnassus Investments Lowered Its Insperity  (NSP) Holding


Green Valley Investors Lowered By $2.65 Million Its Danaher (DHR) Stake, GlaxoSmithKline plc (ADR) (GSK) Covered By 7 Bulls


Highvista Strategies Has Upped Its St Jude Med (STJ) Position; Fil LTD Trimmed Its Ventas (VTR) Position


Tph Asset Management Cut Semgroup (SEMG) Stake; 7 Analysts Bullish Burberry Group plc (LON:BRBY)


683 Capital Management Boosted Oracle (Put) (ORCL) Position; Fil LTD Lifted Virtusa (VRTU) Position


Pennant Capital Management Lowered Dollar Tree (DLTR) Stake By $22.05 Million; 1 Analysts Covering Compass Group plc (ADR) (CMPGY)


Standard Life Investments LTD Has Decreased Medtronic Plc (MDT) Stake By $1.76 Million, Archon Capital Management Has Lowered Chipotle Mexican Grill (CMG) Holding By $5.15 Million


Goldman Sachs Group Has Lowered Its Newlink Genetics (Put) (NLNK) Stake, Thomas White International LTD Has Lifted By $1.17 Million Its Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argenta (BBVA) Position






© Copyright 2015-2017 Huron Report










Get the Next Big Winner in your inbox Before the Bell

Lists*Consumer Eagle



>






















Evanson Asset Management® - Specializing in index and passive management. Low cost, fixed annual retainer fees.























Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds.


Evanson Asset Management®
Specializing in index and passive management.Low cost, fixed annual retainer fees.









Client Section


Email:



Password:













Evanson Asset Management® (EAM) offers low-cost fixed quarterly retainer fees and specializes in index and passive investment management.  EAM derives its investment strategy from Modern Portfolio Theory, and makes use of Dimensional Fund Advisors (DFA), Vanguard, and ETF funds, as well as cash equivalents, maturity laddered bond portfolios and individual securities.  EAM is a registered investment advisor with the Securities and Exchange Commission and manages over $3.8 billion in assets as of Winter 2017.  We have pioneered and promoted low fixed quarterly retainer fees since 1995.  Typical fees range between $625/quarter and $2000/quarter.  Our recommended account minimum is $500,000 although exceptions may be made.
EAM has been ranked within the top 100 US advisory firms by Forbes, Bloomberg, Financial Planning, and Investment News and in June 2016 the Financial Times named EAM one of the top US RIA firms.  Rankings are based on growth and assets under management, not returns.  We custody assets at Schwab, TDAmeritrade, Fidelity, and Jefferson.  EAM is an LLC located in Carmel, California with offices in Monterey, California and Arlington, Virginia.  We may be reached at 1-800-624-1015 or (831) 333-2060, or by e-mail at steven@evansonasset.com . An SEC ADV disclosure document and references are available by request.  Links to a detailed description of our fees and services and articles on a variety of investment topics are presented below.






Using This Website
Fees and Services
Frequently Asked Questions
Active versus Passive Investing
Dimensional Fund Advisors (DFA) and EAM
DFA vs. Vanguard vs. ETF's
Advisory Fees
Investment Risks
Risk and Return
Investor Returns vs Investment Returns



Portfolio Design
Alternative Asset Classes
Stocks for the Long Run?
Asset Allocation for Bears
Tactical Asset Allocation
Inflation Protection
Stock Trading
Actively Managed Mutual Funds
Fixed Income Investing
Rebalancing



Tax Loss Harvesting
Tax Efficiency
Economists and Economics
Book Review: This Time is Different
Investing In High Dividend Stocks
Book Review: The Great Deformation
Key Returns 2000-2016
Financial Superstructures















Copyright ©1997-2017 Evanson Asset Management®
 - ALL RIGHTS RESERVED




Site Navigation








Evanson Asset Management® - Tax Efficiency






















Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds.


Evanson Asset Management®
Specializing in index and passive management.Low cost, fixed annual retainer fees.





back to Home Page




Client Section


Email:



Password:













Updated November 2016
TAX EFFICIENCY AND PASSIVE AND INDEX INVESTING
Abstract:  Passive and index portfolios reduce the pass through of capital gains through very low turnover rates of securities within portfolios.  They can also reduce taxes on dividends through selection of lower yielding dividend paying equities in a given asset class.  Within passive and index portfolios low turnover rates also mean transaction costs and other expenses are reduced for investors.  Over long time frames these reductions increase after tax returns to passive investors significantly.  Annual pass through of capital gains in DFA equity funds typically runs 1% to 2% per year and DFA offers several tax managed and tax advantaged funds which reduce pass throughs even further.

Passive and index investment strategies produce lower capital gains and dividend pass throughs in taxable accounts when compared with active funds.  Active managers frequently trade stocks or bonds and "turn over" securities in portfolios far more rapidly than passive and index managers.  Consequently, investors in actively managed funds or portfolios are likely to realize higher capital gains taxes than passive and index investors.Though there is wide variation, the average actively managed portfolio has a turnover rate of roughly 80% per year, while it is around 10% for passive and index portfolios. There is substantial yearly variation in capital gains depending upon market returns.  For many asset classes and many years DFA's pass-through of capital gains has run around 0% to 2% of the net asset value (NAV) for most of its funds.  DFA also offers many funds which tax managed internally to reduce capital gains and dividend taxes.
Several studies have examined the deleterious effect of high turnover rates on after-tax portfolio returns.  Their effect is substantial.  A Stanford study compared median pre-tax and after-tax performance for 62 actively managed stock mutual funds over a 30 year period from 1963 through 1992.A high tax bracket investor received less than half of the pre-tax performance, 45%, and a medium tax-bracket investor, 59%, due to tax pass throughs.Further, assuming investors cashed out at the end of 30 years they would pay further capital gains upon liquidation and capture only 42% and 55% of the pre-tax return respectively due to pass-throughs.  Over even short time frames the effects of high turnover and capital gains taxes on returns is still substantial.Morningstar looked at returns for actively managed U.S. equity funds for 1992 through 1996.Investors with the highest Federal capital gains tax rates received on average a little over 70% of the total returns they would have received had their money been invested in a tax-deferred account.  Wall Street and mutual funds report performance figures before taxes and liquidation.In fact, mutual fund managers are frequently hired or fired by firms and clients naively comparing their absolute performance with other managers while tax consequences and real after-tax returns are ignored.  A study by David Booth of DFA compared the after-tax performance of two stellar active funds, Janus and Fidelity Magellan, for a 15 year period ending in 2000.  Both funds outperformed the S & P by 2% annually but, after taxes trailed it by 0.4%.  Tax-efficiency matters and passive and index portfolios maximize it.
Another study published in 1993 looked at the pre-tax and after-tax performance of 72 funds classified by Morningstar as large growth or growth and income.Their analysis included funds in existence for the 10 year period from 1982 through 1991 and included the Vanguard S & P 500 index.On a pre-tax basis the Vanguard index outperformed 79% of the actively managed funds.On an after-tax basis, it outperformed 86% of the active funds.  When mutual fund expenses were added in only 2 of the 71 funds 2.8% outperformed the S&P 500 after taxes.  Investors with equity assets in taxable accounts will benefit significantly from using passive and index portfolios as opposed to actively managed and traded portfolios.  Capital gains tax pass throughs and tax-efficiency will vary from year to year in both active and passive portfolios since returns will vary.
DFA offers five tax-managed passive equity funds in discrete asset classes (one asset class per fund) as well as core/vector funds holding multiple asset classes.  Core/vector portfolios reduce turnover even further since they allow asset classes to drift within one fund rather than forcing sales when an equity drifts out of its asset class as is the case for discrete funds.  In addition DFA offers tax-managed versions of two core/vector funds.  In 2009 the majority of DFA's equity funds passed through no capital gains taxes because there were few gains to be had.  DFA's tax-advantaged and tax-managed funds reduce dividend pass throughs by about a third by weeding out high dividend payers in a given asset class.  Aside from using tax-managed funds investors can employ other strategies to minimize taxes in taxable accounts.Fixed income allocations can be filled in laddered portfolios of municipal bonds purchased at par or premium which are then held until maturity.No taxes will be due unless bonds were purchased at a substantial discount.Equity asset classes with potentially high capital gains or dividend income can be placed in various tax-deferred accounts.
Some advisory firms promote tax-loss harvesting.  We examine tax loss harvesting elsewhere on our website in "Tax Loss Harvesting".  We do not promote the practice but will tax loss harvest whenever a client wishes to do so.  Tax loss harvesting involves buying or selling funds to realize losses then using those loses to offset pass-through gains in funds which have produced them or gains from funds which have been sold.  Tax loss harvesting increases transaction costs and may reduce as well as augment after tax returns.
Tax-management strategies in active or passive portfolios rely primarily upon controlling the realization of capital gains and minimizing the pass through of dividends.  Retrospective statistical data promoting the advantage of tax-managed funds generally assumes higher levels of capital gains and dividends which occurred in the past and may not occur as strongly in the future.  Historical data indicates that for very long time frames the majority of returns in equities came from dividends and not from capital gains.  Should capital gains diminish or disappear in a protracted bear market the advantage of tax management would be diminished.  There is evidence for this in fund data during the 2000 through 2002 bear market and the 2008 financial crisis.  Delaying capital gains for ten or twenty years may mean that gains might be realized at a future time when capital gains are higher than today.  Capital gains taxes are low in 2016 and the U.S. government has a need to fund its underfunded budget.
What pass through of capital gains taxes might an investor expect to pay in a well-diversified passive and index portfolio with tax efficient equity funds?Capital gains will vary year to year.Assuming that the few equity asset classes with high tax pass-throughs of capital gains can be held in tax-qualified retirement accounts or a no-load annuity a rough estimate might be that about 1.0% in capital gains might be passed through by tax efficient DFA funds in the average year.This would be taxed at 20% for most investors plus State capital gains taxes if applicable.  Thus, a modest 20% of 1% would be taxed or $200 on $100,000 in equity value.  As of 2016 average dividend yields are historically low around 2% in the US and 3% overseas for most equity asset classes.  With dividends currently taxed at the same rate as capital gains then a $100,000 portfolio might pass-through $2000 annually in dividends resulting in an additional tax on capital gains of $400 to $600 annually on a $100,000 equity portfolio if total capital gains and dividends are included.  What is realized depends substantially on market returns and turnover in a given year.  On a few occasions tax-managed funds have passed through 8% or more in capital gains for a year.  However, overall, passive and index strategies are very tax efficient versus active funds whether they are in normal or tax-managed form.












Copyright ©1997-2017 Evanson Asset Management®
 - ALL RIGHTS RESERVED




Site Navigation








Evanson Asset Management® - DFA vs. Vanguard vs. ETF's






















Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds.


Evanson Asset Management®
Specializing in index and passive management.Low cost, fixed annual retainer fees.





back to Home Page




Client Section


Email:



Password:













Updated December 2016
DFA  VS.  VANGUARD VS.  ETF'S
Abstract:  Historical data on DFA asset class funds for limited time samples show DFA is likely adding 1% to 2% above committee designed indexes in most equity asset classes.  DFA creates additional returns by avoiding the costs bi-annual index reconstitution creates from forcing index trackers to buy or sell the same securities at the same time.  It also makes use of a variety of return enhancing strategies including the use of patient buying and selling strategies, dark pools, Instinet crosses, and stock lending.  ETF (Exchange Traded Fund) indexes are derivative securities with their own set of risks including premiums and discounts from the underlying securities and their tendency to trigger flash crashes in prices.

DFA's approach to portfolio construction and management is fundamentally different from other firms including those employing active management strategies as well as indexes and ETF's.  DFA uses academic research to define asset classes and structures portfolios to capture premiums, additional returns available when asset classes are tilted towards value and small cap stocks and globally diversified.  It also makes use of a variety of other return enhancing strategies.  Every 0.05% of additional return counts.  It is important to note that all passive and index strategies, whether DFA's, indexed mutual funds, or ETF's, have been shown to outperform active management strategies like stock picking and market timing and are almost always the better choice. See "Active and Passive Investment Strategy Comparison" elsewhere on our website.
DFA's asset class portfolios employ statistical analysis of long term data to define and differentiate asset classes and capture their returns.  While sometimes producing asset class returns similar to those from indexes the structure of DFA funds is passive and not based on committee designed indexes.  Indexed mutual funds and ETF's based upon indexes construct portfolios consisting of stocks or fixed income securities which are reviewed and modified by committees.  For example, the S&P 500 index measures the performance of large cap US growth stocks.  The S & P committee meets every six months, generally removes stocks which are doing poorly or fail to meet their criteria and replaces them with stocks which are considered a better fit for the index.  Coincidentially the replacements are often stocks with rising prices and that makes it a quasi-momentum fund.  In the 2008 bear market, for example, the S & P removed over 30 of the 500 stocks in the index.  During the tech/internet crash from early 2000 through end 2002 the NASDAQ 100 index removed over 80 stocks of the 100 stocks in the index.  Although the S & P and other indexes are generally referred to as benchmarks which active managers strive and usually fail to beat, they are more like a foot long ruler that is continually re-lengthened to make measurements look larger.  Benchmarks on benches do not move around.  The composition of indexes is not constant but a variable.
As opposed to committee designed indexes DFA structures portfolios to capture the returns in a well-defined asset class and includes every traded stock in a given asset class which passes its criteria for belonging in that asset class as defined by academic research.  DFA performs various common sense screens like eliminating companies with serious legal or regulatory problems or abnormal price behavior.  All securities in all portfolios are screened daily.  Criteria for asset class membership don't shift as a function of current opinion or committee decisions.  DFA determines the criteria for asset class membership based upon extensive statistical analysis of risk premiums.  Risk premiums are additional returns for additional volatility and risk in a given asset class.  Research by Fama and French and others indicates that the cost of capital for riskier ventures and thus the return to investors for providing that capital are likely to be higher for riskier assets that may be volatile in price or even fail, what's usually referred to as the risk/return trade off.
For equities, DFA identifies two main sources of premiums in U.S., international, and emerging markets.  They are the small cap premium and the value premium.  Historical data show that tilting towards value and small cap stocks in diversified portolios significantly increases returns over ever popular large cap growth and total stock market funds.  For U.S. markets, 1927 to 2007, the large value premium was about 3.5%, the small value premium was about 5.0%, and the small cap premium was about 2%.  For developed non-US markets, 1975 to 2007, the large value premium was about 4.5% and the small value premium was about 5%.  For emerging markets, 1989 to 2007, the value premium was about 4.5%.  Data is more limited for non-US markets but Dimson's study, "Triumph of the Optimists", covering 16 countries for 100 years, shows comparable value and small cap premiums in almost all countries.  It's annual updates for 1900 to 2015 show similar results.  DFA also incorporates momentum and profitability screens for all securities in its portfolios.
DFA  VS. VANGUARD
DFA's factor analytic based asset classes typically have significantly different portfolio compositions than indexes and index ETF's.  During December 2008 Vanguard's US large value index had a higher price/book ratio, 1.70, and higher average market cap, $43.5B, than DFA's US large value portfolio with a 1.30 price/book ratio and $23.1B average market cap.  A higher price/book indicates less capture of the value premium thus the DFA portfolio was more "valuey".  Asset classes go in and out of favor.  In 2008 Vanguard's large cap growth fund produced better returns, -35.97% versus DFA's -40.8%.  But for the trailing 10 year period, DFA's fund returned 2.15% per year versus 0.62% per year for Vanguard, a 153 annual basis point advantage for DFA.  During December 2008, Vanguard's US small value index had a price/book ratio of 1.30 and average market cap of $1.27B versus DFA's with a 1.10 price/book ratio and $0.676B average market cap.  For 2008, Vanguard's small cap value index lost 32.05% versus a larger loss of 36.79% for DFA but for the trailing 10 years DFA's US smalll cap value fund returned 7.32% versus Vanguard's return of 5.22%.  Through 2008 Vanguard's small cap US growth index returned 3.32% versus DFA's small cap return of 4.84% and DFA's US microcap return of 6.44%.  DFA specializes in capturing value and small cap premiums.
Seeking Alpha (October 2016) matched DFA and Vanguard funds by asset class for 1998 through May 2016 and found that DFA outperformed Vanguard by 0.1%, 1.4%, 1.2%, and 0.9% per year in US large cap, large value, small cap and small value asset classes respectively, net of expense ratios.  Vanguard only offers one index fund overseas, its total international stock fund, and it returned 3.9% annually for that period versus returns between 5.4% and 10.7% annually in DFA's various asset class portfolios in international developed and emerging markets.  We have done similar comparisons in the past and came up with an estimate that DFA strategies add somewhere between 1% and 2% annually to globally diversified equity portfolios.  This again highlights the importance of keeping advisory management fees as low as possible in DFA style portfolios.  It also suggests DFA's asset class portfolios are a bit more precise in capturing size and value premiums than committee designed indexes.
None of these comparisons are statistically robust since they are based on the very limited time frames sampled.  They do suggest that DFA's approach has added to returns in several equity asset classes.  DFA's 10 year trailing returns for their US large cap portfolio are near identical to Vanguard's and all other indexes tracking that asset class.  US large cap growth is very much a plain vanilla asset class available through at least one hundred different open-ended and index or ETF mutual funds.  But, that is not the case for most equity asset classes.  For example, through end-2007 the ten year trailing return for DFA's US large value fund was 6.11% versus the Russell large value index return of 4.42%.  DFA's US small value fund returned 9.62% versus 7.47% for the comparable Russell index.  DFA's international value fund returned 9.54% versus a return of 8.04% for the Russell index.  DFA's emerging markets value fund returned 22.22% versus 15.51% for the Russell emerging market index.
HOW DFA CREATES ADDITIONAL RETURNS VERSUS INDEXES AND ETF'S
DFA's additional returns arise from four factors.  The first is the factor analytic structure of their passive portfolios described above versus committee designed indexes.  The second is their avoidance of the cost of index reconstitutions.  Index based mutual funds and ETF's must promptly reconstitute portfolios every time index committees change index compositions.  This means pure index funds must buy and sell when everyone else running index funds does so, making for higher prices when buying and lower prices when selling.  DFA has examined index reconstitution in detail and finds that in day 49 after a change in index composition the cost of maintaining index portfolios subtracts over 60 basis points for US large value, over 120 basis points for US small caps, and 135 basis points for US small value.  A comprehensive study by Sunil Wahal examined all of DFA's equity trades from 2007 through 2009 and found its ability to be a liquidity provider when others were selling or buying generated a 60 to 80 basis point advantage in trading costs for DFA.
In addition to being a patient buyer and seller of securities and avoiding forced index tracking a third way DFA adds value is through extensive use of alternative trading markets like Instinet crossing and "dark pool" trading outside the conventional exchanges.  DFA is a patient slow buyer and seller of securities for all portfolios at all times.  A comprehensive study by Sunil Wahil examined all of DFA's equity trades from 2007 through 2009, over 1.3 million trades representing about $89 billion, and estimates DFA added 60 bps. to 80 bps. from reducing trading costs.The fourth way DFA creates additional returns versus indexes is from securities lending.  DFA is a major securities lender.  During fiscal year 2006, DFA's US securities lending added between 0 and 66 basis points to returns.
Often proponents of index mutual funds and ETF's promote their low fee structures.  While Vanguard and ETF based indexes do have slightly lower expense ratios for comparable asset classes DFA's funds are low cost and have far lower expense ratios than active funds.  Typically, the cost difference between DFA's funds and pure indexes or ETF's runs 10 to 25 basis points annually.  A common argument for ETF's is that they don't pass through yearly capital gains to investors since their structure is that of a derivative instrument.  Investors don't actually own shares, they own a number representing shares.  This argument has some merit though is often overemphasized.  ETF shares are derivative securities and not the same as directly owning shares.  DFA's funds typically pass through 1% to 2% or less of net asset value in capital gains each year, very low, and they've many tax-managed funds which reduce taxable pass-throughs even further.  All DFA, Vanguard, and ETF portfolios are very tax-efficient compared to actively managed portfolios.
POTENTIAL RISKS WITH ETF'S
ETF's are derivative securities with their own special characteristics and risks.  They are very different in structure from conventional open-ended mutual funds like those from DFA and Vanguard.  The purchasers of ETF's own shares in pledged assets where the share price can be above or below the actual market value of the shares.  Purchasers of ETF shares should be aware of the possibility that ETF's can trade at a substantial discount to the shares backing their net asset value (NAV) and thus don't accurately track the indexes and involve more share price volatility.  In theory, arbitrageurs will close the big spreads between share price and NAV if shares are priced under the NAV but a casual perusal of historical share price versus net asset value for ETF's reveals that many have traded at a 10% or 20% discount for months or years.  The Financial Times (5-24-14) notes that when market stress develops and investors need liquidity the most and wish to sell their ETF shares the authorized participants in ETF's who create the pledged shares are unlikely to close the gap by buying shares but will rather redeem their pledged shares to exit a losing position and leave ETF shareholders with shares worth less than the disappearing security pledges.
The New York Federal Reserve Bank, Wall Street's top regulator, announced in December 2014 that extreme price movements in ETF's holding stocks, bonds and other assets had prompted it to take a closer look at the inner workings of ETF's.  Nothing has been done as of late 2016.  The  ETF industry had about $3 trillion under managment as of Fall 2016.  The Fed is concerned that ETF share prices may not always reflect underlying asset values and that the authorized participants who create ETF shares might not do so if there are heavy redemption requests.
ETF's are not profitable for fund companies unless they hold $50 to $100 million or more in assets and thus many close when they can't raise sufficient assets.  During 2009 through 2010 about 140 shut down.  Hundreds of ETF's perform differently than the indexes they are supposed to track, sometimes strikingly so (WSJ, 10-10-10).  Their average tracking error versus the index was 1.25% in 2009.  Leveraged ETF's are even more problematic.  As of November 2010, all 52 leveraged ETF's that were operating since January 2008 had lost money according to Morningstar, even those where the underlying index rose.
And, ETF's are involved in speculative high frequency computer trading on Wall Street.  This was dramatically illustrated in the so-called "flash crash" on May 6, 2010 where the Dow fell almost 800 points in 25 minutes.  The Wall Street Journal reported that while the Dow lost as much as 9.2% temporarily many ETF's lost almost all their value, some dropping to pennies a share.  This is hardly the liquidity HFT proponents claim.  Many ETF's saw their net asset value fall only 8% to 9% while their share price plunged 60% or more, triggering stop losses far below where investors purchased the ETF's.  NASDAQ cancelled over 10000 trades that took place more than 60% below the pre-crash price.  When the damage was tallied about 70% of the cancelled trades during the flash crash involved ETF's (CBSMW, 11-21-10).  Thus, with indexes off around 10%, investors who were down 10% to 60% in ETF's lost significantly more than investors in conventional open-ended mutual funds if their stop losses were triggered.  One of the sales pitches for ETF's is that they allow intradday trading, unlike open-ended mutual funds.
The Wall Street Journal (10-3-12) carried an article entitled "ETF's Seen Moving Market as Tail Wags the Dog".  Sales of midcap stocks were driven by massive sales of midcap ETF's, producing a market where for just the fifth time in the last five years large and small cap indexes rose while midcaps declined on extraordinary volume.  They surmise that large ETF trades were influencing the prices of underlying securities, as opposed to the other way around, since securities prices are supposed to determine ETF prices.  This is another example of distortions introduced by ETF share prices departing from the quote prices of the underlying securities they represent.  For example, on June 20th 2013, a day where equity indexes declined substantially, the Financial Times reported, "The losses for ETF's today were far beyond what the most sophisticated financial risk models could have predicted for worst-case scenarios."  Illiquidity quickly became a problem.
On 7-25-13 the Financial Times reported that high levels of settlement failures on ETF's have revived a debate about their structure and liquidity.  Settlement failures occur when banks pledge assets to ETF's then fail to deliver them.  The Bank of International Settlements, the central bankers bank, had warned that settlement failures on ETF's pose potential systemic problems to the financial system.  Says one critic, "This is an unrealised operational risk which could morph into an actual operational risk in nanoseconds.  What is the actual liquidity of a security if it takes five days to find the security to make settlement?"  In May 2015 Reuters reported that the country's largest ETF providers are arranging billion dollar credit lines that can be tapped to keep illiquidity from turning an ETF sell-off into a credit market meltdown.  Vanguard Group, Guggenheim Investments and First Trust are among US fund companies that have lined up new or expanded bank guarantees.
On 12-12-16 and 12-13-16 the Financial Times reported that John Bogle, the founder of Vanguard funds, is calling on politicians to re-examine ETF's.  He complained that the annual turnover of securities in the biggest ETF that tracks the S&P 500 sometimes reach a stunning 3000% of assets.  He found that where mutual fund and ETF investors are invested in the same underlying fund, ETF investors trailed returns in conventional open ended funds by a large 1.6% annually.  He notes that the intraday market pricing in ETF's encourages trading (while prices in open ended funds are only set after the market close) and the evidence is clear that trading decreases returns.
On 2-1-16 the Financial Times published an article entitled, "Is it time to halt the rise of the ETF machine".  They note that on August 24th, 2015 more than a fifth of all US ETF's were forced to stop trading when the Dow Jones Industrial average dropped more than 1,100 points before rebounding.  Trading was littered with more than 1,000 halts that inhibited the essential arbitrage mechanisms of ETF's and prompted their prices to fall well below the indices they were designed to track.  Vanguard founder John Bogle has warned about ETF's even though Vanguard offers them, emphasizing their "sheer size and fragility in times of market stress".  The Financial Stability Board, set up after the 2008 financial crisis, said it had seen "a number of disquieting developments" in ETF's.  The Bank of England warned that the risks associated with ETF's are not being made clear.
ETF declines on August 24th, 2015 were again serious.  The US equity markets gapped down and major indexes declined 6% to 7% from their prior closing prices.  Many ETF's declined 10% to 35% with 220 ETF's declining at least 10%.  ETF liquidity disappeared instantly, thanks to high frequency trading computers, even though ETF's are supposed to track the underlying securities that have been pledged and enhance liquidity.  ETF providers immediately blamed rules put in place by NYSE Rule 48 after the May 2010 flash crash claiming they prevented accurate pricing of ETF's.  HFT traders said they did not have enough information to run their algorithms, backed out of the market, and withdrew liquidity.  The Dow plunged 1000 points to "reveal the structural limitations" underlying US equities.  Futures, cash and ETF's are priced and arbitraged off each other and according to the Financial Times HFT showed  "evidence of cracks in the plumbing that underpins the world's largest equity market."  Despite all the warnings from financial regulators and others no changes in ETF trading have been made as of late 2016.
A major marketing point promoted by the ETF industry is that they can be traded and stopped out any time during market hours.  But, during the May 2010 flash crash ETF investors were burned at the very moment they needed liquidity the most.  According to a Trim Tabs report ETF investors are so bad at picking the right time to buy or short-sell the equity markets that those doing exactly the opposite of what ETF investors did would have ended up with 700% profits.  Trim Tabs theorized that ETF's are mostly traded by less informed more emotional retail investors.  They believe the supposed liquidity of ETF's gives inexperienced investors a false sense of power.  DFA funds and index based mutual funds offered by Vanguard do not trade at a discount or premium to net asset value, cannot be shorted, and are only priced at market close.  EAM never recommends trading DFA funds, indexes or ETF's. This is discussed in "Tactical Asset Allocation" elsewhere on our website.
Another major marketing point of ETF's is their very low expense ratio.  Typically, ETF expense ratios run 10 to 15 basis points for fixed income and 15 to 30 basis points for equities but it varies depending upon asset classes and vendors.  Open-ended conventional mutual funds in passive and index funds from DFA and Vanguard typically run about 5 to 30 basis points above ETF's.  However, there is often a hidden additional cost to ETF's that is almost never mentioned.  ETF's are, in a sense, derivatives.  The shares they sell come from securities pledged to the ETF by other investment companies such as mutual funds.  When these companies lend the stock to ETF's there is some operational cost incurred for the share lender and that is ultimately passed on to the investor though we have been unable to determine what it is.  A Financial Times article (2-4-13) reported that US pension funds have sued Blackrock for "looting" securities lending revenues through creating an affiliate which profits from lending to Blackrock's US-listed iShares.
ETF's also engage in share lending.  ETFR (October 2010), the monthly publication of "Index Universe", reported that lending from ETF's is a practice shrouded in mystery and that obfuscation is the norm.  In any traded security obfuscation is not in the investor's interest.  ETFR notes that ETF's lend securities and collect money from that lending.  The borrower of the shares gives the ETF some form of collateral equal to the value of the loaned shares.  The ETF Company can then use that collateral, usually Treasuries or cash equivalents, to invest elsewhere.  Some of the profits from the invested collateral go to ETF shareholders and some to the ETF Company but it is highly variable.  They quote a leading securities law expert, "They don't want to talk about it because they don't want to disclose the extent to which they keep the proceeds."  ETFR notes, however, that the investment risk from proceeds rests entirely with the shareholders.  ETF lending exposes shareholders to counter party risk.  ETF companies differ greatly on their policies regarding lending and shareholder splits on fees. Vanguard gives investors 100% of their profits from lending, Wisdom Tree, 70%, and I-shares won't discuss its lending policies.
In summary, DFA's strategies, outlined above, aim to add value well above pure indexes and ETF's.  Although we always recommend and prefer DFA's offerings for equity allocations our philosophy at EAM is "candid but not dogmatic" and we sometimes mix DFA funds with Vanguard funds or ETF offerings if clients wish.












Copyright ©1997-2017 Evanson Asset Management®
 - ALL RIGHTS RESERVED




Site Navigation








Evanson Asset Management® - Stock Trading






















Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds.


Evanson Asset Management®
Specializing in index and passive management.Low cost, fixed annual retainer fees.





back to Home Page




Client Section


Email:



Password:













Updated November 2016
STOCK TRADING 
Abstract:  Professional money managers and mutual fund managers with large research teams, expensive computing power, and extensive experience cannot, in the aggregate, outperform the market and those managers who will beat the market cannot be identified in advance.  Trading strategies are always changing.  Risk parity trading did very well until 2016 then fell behind other strategies. Trading on price momentum has been popular for decades though research indicates that trading costs offset returns.  High frequency trading with supercomputers running nanosecond fast data purchased from exchanges dominate the markets in 2016, often holding positions in milliseconds.  It is unlikely retail investors will beat the market trading stocks.

Few investment activities are as exhilarating as researching a stock, buying it, watching its price double in a few months, and taking your profits. A huge industry exists to feed this desire. The financial media constantly provide ideas and strategies that might make money, particularly fast money, trading stocks. Unfortunately, stock trading is a form of gambling and has the same outcome. Eventually, if not immediately, traders are very likely to underperform the market or lose money. Just what are the facts on trading stocks?: 
PROFESSIONAL MONEY MANAGERS CANNOT, IN THE AGGREGATE, OUTPERFORM THE MARKETS.  Full-time professional money managers and mutual fund managers control trillions of stock market dollars.  Despite very low trading costs, teams of research analysts with advanced degrees, inside connections, and sophisticated mathematical and computer models, they do not consistently beat the average "chance" returns given by markets.  We discuss this elsewhere on our website in "Active versus Passive Management".  It's folly for an individual investor to believe he'll beat the professionals or the markets, particularly if he gets his ideas from the mainstream financial media.And, the research evidence is clear.  By the time the retail investor gets a stock idea from CNBC, the WSJ or Barron's, the proprietary accounts at big brokerage firms and investment banks and mutual funds already own them.  A retail investor is very unlikely to beat the Street which is itself unlikely to beat the indexes.  Retail investors often believe that have special knowledge during bull markets leading to an old Wall Street saying, "Don't mistake a bull market for brains".
PAST PERFORMANCE OF PROFESSIONAL MANAGERS DOESN'T PREDICT THEIR FUTURE PERFORMANCE.  While active professional traders are quick to point to the minority of managers and mutual funds which outperform the market as evidence of their skill, those who will beat the market cannot be selected in advance because past performance doesn't predict future performance.A mountain of evidence from numerous studies supports this view.  EAM sometimes talks with individual retail investors who claim they have outperformed the markets through timing or trading strategies.  While this is often the result of selective memory even those who have beaten the market cannot be sure they will do so in the future.In fact, the Dalbar studies referenced elsewhere on this site show that retail stock investors are likely to produce CD like returns for 20 year periods.
INVESTMENT FIRMS AND ADVISORS NEVER GUARANTEE FUTURE RETURNS BECAUSE THEY KNOW THAT THEY DON'T KNOW HOW WELL THEY WILL DO.  No active professional traders are so sure of their stock trading skills that they will guarantee investors they'll beat market averages or compensate investors if they fail to do so. Optimism about their skills and offerings is, however, always high.  If the professionals are unlikely to beat change returns individual investors shouldn't be confident they can either.  Several studies of self-traded accounts at discount brokerages indicate that the average amateur investor does about as well as the average professional if he's a light trader and the more he trades the poorer his returns.  Trading frequently destroy profits. 
PROFESSIONAL TRADING SYSTEMS ARE ALWAYS CHANGING.  Traders are forever hoping to find "hot" stocks, or better still, a system for selecting stocks that will consistently yield profits.  Perhaps, the all-time, most popular stock trading system is Value Line, a widely distributed proprietary stock selection manual found in many public libraries.  It boasts impressive theoretical results, soundly beating the market.  Yet, of the three mutual funds run by Value Line, none managed to beat the S & P 500 index, let alone capture the remarkable theoretical returns it claims.  Bill O'Neill, founder of Investors Business Daily and author, has promoted price momentum trading for 25 years, makes big claims for his chart interpretations, yet the mutual fund he ran underperformed the market.  As of 2016, high frequency trading (HFT) with supercomputers dominates the market and accounts for 50% to 90% of all trading on the major exchanges.  In the early 2000's there was no HFT.  HFT computers are colocated a few feet from exchanges and purchase exchange data and receive quotes a few nanoseconds before other traders.  HFT computers then place trades thousands of times per second with strategies like quote stuffing and cascading and front run and manipulate prices.  Such trading has nothing to do with company fundamentals, traditional technical trading, or macroeconomic based trading models.  The individual investor is a pawn in this predatory game.  The HFT industry, of course, claims it adds liquidity and value to markets.
WALL STREET AND THE FINANCIAL MEDIA PROVIDE RETAIL INVESTORS WITH A CONTINUOUS STREAM OF TEMPTING INVESTMENT IDEAS.  Pundits, fund managers, financial experts of all stripes, books, newsletters and seminars stimulate the desires of the stock trading public.  One of the more popular books is William O'Neill's, "How to Make Money in Stocks."  He publishes a daily investment newspaper, offers books, and conducts seminars, claiming big profits from his stock selection system.  Like Value Line, there appears to be a substantial gap between theory and performance. O'Neill's mutual fund failed to outperform the S & P 500 and was finally sold to another fund company. 
Hundreds of newsletters are published monthly to assist stock traders in choosing profitable stocks and timing markets.  They don't work.  Only one newsletter of 29 "survivors" from 1993 through 2007 beat the market.  From 2002 to 2007, only two newsletterss out of 105 beat the market.  Most newsletters don't last long enough to create long-term track records and chance alone should have produced far more market beating newsletters. 
"Fundamental" traders do thorough research on the financial statements of companies, their management, and the industries they compete in.  They then choose stocks they believe to be "undervalued" by some set of criteria.  For example, earnings per share growth rates are sometimes considered a very important determinant of future stock prices and are announced and commented on constantly by the financial press.  Research indicates earnings growth is a weak predictor of future company growth and share price growth and often far off the mark.  Worse still, the majority of professional and retail investors today have short holding periods while investing based on company fundamentals assumes that time, measured in years, will be required to realize the value in a company.  
"Technical" traders pay close attention to stock prices, volume, and chart patterns, analyzing them with statistical techniques and intuition.  Predictions are made about what stocks or industries or asset classes will go up or down.  Unfortunately, research on stock price behavior has found that only a tiny fraction of future stock prices, 3% to 4%, can be explained by historical price data.  Many studies have found that typical technical formulas fall apart under rigorous statistical examination though all systems work at least occasionally.
"Macroeconomic" traders are forever trying to appraise the condition and direction of the economy from the continuous flow of government statistics.  Usually, predictions are also made as to what the Federal Reserve will do and many economists and financial pundits try to interpret the Fed's ambiguous and optimistic language in its public pronouncements.  This "macroeconomic" approach is then used to predict which market sectors and stocks will do well.  Unfortunately, macroeconmic data from government statistical agencies is of questionable quality, constantly revised, and spun in the most optimistic manner possible by the financial press.  Research indicates that economists and economic experts have no greater skill than  chance guessing in predicting future economic events.  We examine this elsewhere on our website in "Economists and Economics".  
DISHONESTY IS ENDEMIC IN THE INVESTMENT BUSINESS.  Just like the gambling business, the stock trading advisory and publishing business has its share of dishonest practitioners.  Investment guru Wade Cook promised that for up to $8000 for a three day seminar he'd teach investors how to double their money every three months in the stock market.  More than 400,000 people attended his seminars in 1997 netting his company $100 million.  In 1997, his publically traded corporation lost 13% trading its own account while the market went up 23%.  Promises and future performance frequently diverge in the world of stock trading advice.  Bernie Madoff's long-running and hugely profitable Ponzi scheme fooled even professional investors and major investment firms.  Bernie Madoof said that he was surprised he hadn't been found out years earlier.  Investors are impressed by investment experts.
EVEN EXPERTS CAN'T PICK STOCKS WELL.  A WSJ article (1-15-11), "Why You Shouldn't Trust Wall Street's Top Stocks for 2011", examined the price performance of 10 stocks analysts rated most highly as "buys" and 10 stocks analysts expected to do the worst.  In 2008 and 2009 analysts top rated stocks trailed the S&P by 9% and 4% respectively while their sell rated stocks beat the S&P by an incredible 44% in 2009.  In 2010, their top rated stocks beat the S&P by 11% but their sell rated stocks beat the S&P by 19%.  Numerous studies confirm these findings.  There's little if any evidence that trained professionals can pick stocks any better than random chance. 
INVESTMENT CLUBS MAY BE COMFORTING BUT ARE UNLIKELY TO PROVIDE INVESTORS WITH ABOVE MARKET RETURNS.  Investment clubs, of which there were some 13,000 plus in the U.S. in 2005, often get financial media coverage when a particular club produces exceptional returns.  For many years, the Beardstown Ladies stock club, frequently mentioned in the WSJ, boasted an average return of 23%+ annually and sold millions of copies of books full of stock trading tips.  Unfortunately, in 1997 it was discovered that their record keeping was inadequate and their real returns were under 10%, below those given by market indexes.  Other studies have found that investment clubs, in the aggregate, underperform the markets.
EVEN JIM CRAMER ON CNBC DOESN'T BEAT THE MARKET.  The folly of trading hot stock ideas is dramatically illustrated by Jim Cramer's popular CNBC show "Mad Money".  A former hedge fund manager and allegedly hot stock picker, Barron's lead article on August 20, 2007 reported that over the prior two years Cramer's stocks were up about 12% while the Dow rose 22% and the S&P 16%.  Diversified equally weighted DFA equity portfolios returned around 40%.  Over more than 100 stocks he recommended in 2007, Cramer trailed the S&P return by 2.2%.  Barron's found that selling Cramer's recommendations short offered an opportunity to make 5% to 30% per year.  Worse still, Barron's revealed some of Cramer's hedge fund strategies.  They are not atypical for Wall Street and also are not illegal.  Cramer's firm would build a position in a stock which had petered out, then hunt up some bullish news on the company and feed it to sellside analysts and financial reporters and viewers.  On the subsequent rise, Cramer and company would profit by selling out their position.  "Buzz merchandizing" is what Cramer calls it.  Most investors today do not realize that stock selling and trading was regarded as a highly unreputable business full of gamblers and con artists until the 1920's, and didn't reachieve acceptance after the 1929 crash until well after WWII.  Decades of advertising, lobbying and political contributions by brokerage firms and huge public relations campaigns paid off.  Stock trading could become disreputable again in the future, particularly given what occured in 2008.
CONCLUSION:  Since there is little evidence that retail investors or professionals can consistently beat average market returns and a great deal of evidence that no one can predict where the market or individual stocks are going investors should avoid trading stocks.  Investors should particularly avoid listening to hot stock ideas or following trading systems promoted by the financial media.  EAM recommends that money allocated to stocks should be invested in a diversified portfolio of passive asset class and index funds for time frames of ten years or longer.  












Copyright ©1997-2017 Evanson Asset Management®
 - ALL RIGHTS RESERVED




Site Navigation































	Home




 



 HOME OUR FIRM OUR TEAM STRATEGIES RESEARCH ECM IN THE NEWS  INVESTOR PORTAL CONTACT LOGIN 











 P: 847-328-4961 F: 847-328-4676 

© 2017 Evanston Capital Management, LLC.

All Rights Reserved




 





Evanston Capital Management, LLC (“ECM”) is an alternative investment management firm focused on providing multi-manager hedge fund programs for institutional and high net worth investors. Formed in 2002, ECM manages a variety of strategies emphasizing more concentrated portfolios, and ECM seeks to identify portfolio managers in which ECM has gained high conviction. ECM manages commingled funds and offers customized solutions to clients looking to tailor their hedge fund program.  ECM has more than 250 institutional investor relationships and approximately $4.5 billion in assets under management as of July 1, 2017.   Click here to listen to Adam Blitz, ECM’s CEO &
Chief
Investment Officer, discuss today's hedge fund landscape on the Capital Allocators
Podcast hosted by Ted Seides. 




	THIS WEBSITE DOES NOT CONSTITUTE AN OFFER TO SELL, OR A SOLICITATION OF AN OFFER TO BUY, INVESTMENT ADVISORY SERVICES PROVIDED BY ECM.  SUCH AN OFFER, IF MADE, WILL BE MADE TO QUALIFIED INVESTORS SOLELY BY WAY OF THE OFFERING DOCUMENTS RELATING TO THE RELEVANT PRODUCT WHICH ARE APPROVED FOR USE BY ECM, AND ONLY IN JURISDICTIONS IN WHICH SUCH AN OFFER WOULD BE LAWFUL.
  
ALL SECURITIES INVESTMENTS RISK THE LOSS OF CAPITAL, INCLUDING POSSIBLE LOSS OF THE ENTIRE AMOUNT INVESTED.  NO GUARANTEE OR REPRESENTATION IS MADE THAT ANY PRODUCTS ADVISED OR SPONSORED BY ECM WILL BE SUCCESSFUL OR AVOID LOSSES. THE PAST PERFORMANCE OF ECM AND THE PRODUCTS ADVISED OR SPONSORED BY ECM ARE NOT NECESSARILY INDICATIVE OF FUTURE RESULTS. 
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HEREIN IS SOLELY FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES AND IS SUBJECT TO CHANGE FROM TIME TO TIME.  ECM IS NOT OBLIGATED TO NOTIFY YOU OF CHANGES TO THIS INFORMATION. 



 




	First time at Evanston Capital Management?    





Login





Username


Enter your username



Password


Enter your password




Remember me on this computer





				Login
			








		Help:
		
		    Forgot your password?
		



The system has not been configured to send email.


Contact an administrator to reset your password manually.

	        Or, ask an administrator to configure the system. 
	        
	            Details
	        



The system has not been configured to send emails. Go to SMTP settings or ask your administrator to set them
How to set SMTP?

Once logged, go to Administration > Settings > Advanced
In that screen, select System > SMTP Settings





	    The system is denied the permission(s) to send email.
	

Contact an administrator to reset your password manually.

	        Or, ask an administrator to configure the system. 
	        
	            Details
	        













 
 
 
 















EVANSON ASSET MANAGEMENT, LLC Form ADV Details as of 2017-02-06  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















WhaleWisdom /
Filer Search /
EVANSON ASSET MANAGEMENT, LLC /
Form ADV Filing



Quick Nav

Top
Identifying Info
SEC Registration
Organization
Advisory Business
Clients
Compensation
AUM
Advisory Activites
Other Business
Custody
Disclosures



Form ADV Compilation Report
EVANSON ASSET MANAGEMENT, LLC
Compilation done on 2017-02-06

Item 1 Identifying Information


A.


   Your full legal name (if you are a sole proprietor, your last, first, and middle names):





EVANSON ASSET MANAGEMENT, LLC




B.


   Name under which you primarily conduct your advisory business, if different from Item 1.A. 





EVANSON ASSET MANAGEMENT, LLC




D.


   your SEC file number:





801-64387




E.


   If you have a number (“CRD Number”) assigned by the FINRA’s CRD system or by the IARD system, your CRD number





135188





    Principal Office and Place of Business
  












   Telephone number at this location:





831-333-2060







   Facsimile number at this location:





831-333-2063





      Mailing Address
    









I


   Do you have one or more websites?






 Yes
 No







HTTP://WWW.EVANSONASSET.COM





M


   Are you registered with a foreign financial regulatory authority?





  Yes
  No





N


   Are you a public reporting company under Sections 12 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934?





  Yes
  No





O


   Did you have $1 billion or more in assets on the last day of your most recent fiscal year?





  Yes
  No




Item 2 SEC Registration

To register (or remain registered) with the SEC, you must check at least one of the Items 2.A.(1) through
    2.A.(12), below. If you are submitting an annual updating amendment to your SEC registration and you
    are no longer eligible to register with the SEC, check Item 2.A.(13). Part 1A Instruction 2 provides
    information to help you determine whether you may affirmatively respond to each of these items.
    :
You (the adviser)


(1)




    are a large advisory firm
    




(2)




    are a mid-sized advisory firm
    




(3)




    have your principal office and place of business in Wyoming
    




(4)




    have your principal office and place of business outside the United States
    




(5)




    are an investment adviser (or sub-adviser) to an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940
    




(6)




    are an investment adviser to a company which has elected to be a business development
    company
    




(7)




    are a pension consultant with respect to assets of plans having an aggregate value of at least
    $200,000,000 that qualifies for the exemption in rule 203A-2(a)
    




(8)




    are a related adviser under rule 203A-2(b)
    




(9)




    ) are a newly formed adviser relying on rule 203A-2(c) because you expect to be eligible for SEC
    registration within 120 days;
    




(10)




    are a multi-state adviser that is required to register in 15 or more states and is relying on rule
    203A-2(d); 
    




(11)




    are an Internet adviser relying on rule 203A-2(e);
    




(12)




    have received an SEC order exempting you from the prohibition against registration with the
    SEC;
    




(13)




    are no longer eligible to remain registered with the SEC.
    


SEC Reporting by Exempt Reporting Advisors


(1)




    qualify for the exemption from registration as an adviser solely to one or more venture capital
    funds;
    




(2)




    qualify for the exemption from registration because you act solely as an adviser to private funds
    and have assets under management in the United States of less than $150 million;
    




(3)




    act solely as an adviser to private funds but you are no longer eligible to check box 2.B.(2)
    because you have assets under management in the United States of $150 million or more.
    


State Securities Authority Notice Filings and State Reporting by Exempt Reporing Advisors


C


   Under state laws, SEC-registered advisers may be required to provide to state securities authorities a copy
    of the Form ADV and any amendments they file with the SEC. These are called notice filings. In addition,
    exempt reporting advisers may be required to provide state securities authorities with a copy of reports and
    any amendments they file with the SEC. If this is an initial application or report, check the box(es) next to
    the state(s) that you would like to receive notice of this and all subsequent filings or reports you submit to
    the SEC. If this is an amendment to direct your notice filings or reports to additional state(s), check the
    box(es) next to the state(s) that you would like to receive notice of this and all subsequent filings or reports
    you submit to the SEC. If this is an amendment to your registration to stop your notice filings or reports
    from going to state(s) that currently receive them, uncheck the box(es) next to those state(s). 











AL
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DE
DC
FL
GA
ID
IL
IN
IA
KS
LA
MD
MA
MI
MN
MO
MT
NV
NJ
NY
NC
OH
OR
PA
SC
TN
TX
UT
VA
WA
WI




Item 3 Form of Organization


A


   How are you organized:





Limited Liability Company 




B


   In what month does your fiscal year end each year? 





DECEMBER




C


   Under the laws of what state or country are you organized?





CA  United States



Item 5 Information About Your Advisory Business


A


   Approximately how many employees do you have? Include full- and part-time employees but do not
     include any clerical workers.





8




B (1)


   Approximately how many of the employees reported in 5.A. perform investment advisory functions
    (including research)? 





4




(2)


   Approximately how many of the employees reported in 5.A. are registered representatives of a brokerdealer?





0




(3)


   Approximately how many of the employees reported in 5.A. are registered with one or more state
    securities authorities as investment adviser representatives? 





4




(4)


   Approximately how many of the employees reported in 5.A. are registered with one or more state
    securities authorities as investment adviser representatives for an investment adviser other than you? 





0




(5)


   Approximately how many of the employees reported in 5.A. are licensed agents of an insurance
    company or agency? 





0




(6)


   Approximately how many firms or other persons solicit advisory clients on your behalf? 





0



Clients


C (1)


   To approximately how many clients did you provide investment advisory services during your most
     recently completed fiscal year? 





More than 100 1200




(2)


   Approximately what percentage of your clients are non-United States persons?





0




D (1)


   What types of clients do you have? Indicate the approximate percentage that each type of client
    comprises of your total number of clients. If a client fits into more than one category, check all
    that apply.









(a)


   Individuals (other than
    high net worth individuals) 





Up to 10 percent




(b)


   High net worth individuals





76-99 percent




(c)


   Banking or thrift institutions





0 percent




(d)


   Investment companies 





0 percent




(e)


   Business development companies





0 percent




(f)


   Pooled investment vehicles (other than
     investment companies)





0 percent




(g)


   Pension and profit sharing plans
     (but not the plan participants)





0 percent




(h)


   Charitable organizations 





Up to 10 percent




(i)


   Corporations or other businesses
     not listed above





Up to 10 percent




(j)


   State or municipal government entities





0 percent




(k)


   Other investment advisers





0 percent




(l)


   Insurance companies 





0 percent




(m)


   Other:





0 percent 




D (2)


   Indicate the approximate amount of your regulatory assets under management (reported in Item 5.F.
    below) attributable to each of the following type of client. If a client fits into more than one category,
    check all that apply









(a)


   Individuals (other than
        high net worth individuals) 





Up to 25 percent




(b)


   High net worth individuals





More than 75 percent




(c)


   Banking or thrift institutions





0 percent




(d)


   Investment companies 





0 percent




(e)


   Business development companies





0 percent




(f)


   Pooled investment vehicles (other than
         investment companies)





0 percent




(g)


   Pension and profit sharing plans
         (but not the plan participants)





0 percent




(h)


   Charitable organizations 





Up to 25 percent




(i)


   Corporations or other businesses
         not listed above





Up to 25 percent




(j)


   State or municipal government entities





0 percent




(k)


   Other investment advisers





0 percent




(l)


   Insurance companies 





0 percent




(m)


   Other:





0 percent 



Compensation Arrangements


E


   You are compensated for your investment advisory services by (check all that apply): 









(1)




    A percentage of assets under your management
    




(2)




    Hourly charges
    




(3)




    Subscription fees (for a newsletter or periodical)
    




(4)




    Fixed fees (other than subscription fees) 
    




(5)




    Commissions 
    




(6)




    Performance-based fees
    




(7)




    Other
    



Regulatory Assets Under Management


F (1)


   Do you provide continuous and regular supervisory or management services to securities
     portfolios? 






 Yes
 No





F (2) (a)


   If yes, what is the amount of your regulatory assets under management?  Discretionary





3398192291.0




F (2) (b)


   If yes, what is the amount of your regulatory assets under management?  Non-Discretionary





9861421.0




F (2) (c)


   If yes, what is the amount of your regulatory assets under management?  Total





0.0




F (2) (d)


   If yes, what is the total number of accounts?  Discretionary





4896




F (2) (e)


   If yes, what is the total number of accounts?  Non-Discretionary





17




F (2) (f)


   If yes, what is the total number of accounts?  Total





4913



Advisory Activities


G


   What type(s) of advisory services do you provide? Check all that apply. 









(1)




    Financial planning services 
    




(2)




    Portfolio management for individuals and/or small businesses 
    




(3)




    Portfolio management for investment companies (as well as “business development companies”
     that have made an election pursuant to section 54 of the Investment Company Act of 1940) 
    




(4)




    Portfolio management for pooled investment vehicles (other than investment companies) 
    




(5)




    Portfolio management for businesses (other than small businesses) or institutional clients
    (other than registered investment companies and other pooled investment vehicles) 
    




(6)




    Pension consulting services
    




(7)




    Selection of other advisers (including private fund managers)
    




(8)




    Publication of periodicals or newsletters 
    




(9)




    Security ratings or pricing services 
    




(10)




    Market timing services 
    




(11)




    Educational seminars/workshops
    




(12)




    Other
    




H


   If you provide financial planning services, to how many clients did you provide these services during your
    last fiscal year?





26-50







   If more than 500, how many?









I


   If you participate in a wrap fee program, do you (check all that apply): 









(1)




    sponsor the wrap fee program?
    




(2)




    act as a portfolio manager for the wrap fee program?
    




J


   In response to Item 4.B. of Part 2A of Form ADV, do you indicate that you provide investment advice only
    with respect to limited types of investments? 





  Yes
  No




Item 6 Other Business Activities


A


   You are actively engaged in business as a (check all that apply):









(1)




    broker-dealer (registered or unregistered)
    




(2)




    registered representative of a broker-dealer
    




(3)




    commodity pool operator or commodity trading advisor (whether registered or exempt from
    registration)
    




(4)




    futures commission merchant
    




(5)




    real estate broker, dealer, or agent 
    




(6)




    insurance broker or agent 
    




(7)




    bank (including a separately identifiable department or division of a bank) 
    




(8)




    trust company
    




(9)




    registered municipal advisor
    




(10)




    registered security-based swap dealer
    




(11)




    major security-based swap participant
    




(12)




    accountant or accounting firm 
    




(13)




    lawyer or law firm
    




(14)




    other financial product salesperson
    




B (1)


   Are you actively engaged in any other business not listed in Item 6.A. (other than giving investment
     advice)?





  Yes
  No





B (2)


   If yes, is this other business your primary business?





  Yes
  No





B (3)


   Do you sell products or provide services other than investment advice to your advisory clients?





  Yes
  No



Item 7 Financial Industry Affiliations and Private Fund Reporting


A


   This part of Item 7 requires you to provide information about you and your related persons, including
    foreign affiliates. Your related persons are all of your advisory affiliates and any person that is under
    common control with you.
    You have a related person that is a (check all that apply): 









(1)




    broker-dealer, municipal securities dealer, or government securities broker or dealer
    




(2)




    other investment adviser (including financial planners) 
    




(3)




    registered municipal advisor
    




(4)




    registered security-based swap dealer
    




(5)




    major security-based swap participant 
    




(6)




    commodity pool operator or commodity trading advisor (whether registered or exempt from
    registration) 
    




(7)




    futures commission merchant
    




(8)




    banking or thrift institution 
    




(9)




    trust company
    




(10)




    accountant or accounting firm
    




(11)




     lawyer or law firm 
    




(12)




    insurance company or agency
    




(13)




    pension consultant 
    




(14)




    real estate broker or dealer
    




(15)




    sponsor or syndicator of limited partnerships (or equivalent), excluding pooled
    investment vehicles 
    




(16)




    sponsor, general partner, managing member (or equivalent) of pooled investment vehicles
    




B.


   Are you an adviser to any private fund?





  Yes
  No



Item 8 Participation or Interest in Client Transactions


A. (1)


   Do you or any related person: buy securities for yourself from advisory clients, or sell securities you own to
     advisory clients (principal transactions)? 





  Yes
  No





(2)


   Do you or any related person: buy or sell for yourself securities (other than shares of mutual funds) that you
    also recommend to advisory clients?






 Yes
 No





(3)


   Do you or any related person: recommend securities (or other investment products) to advisory clients in
    which you or any related person has some other proprietary (ownership)
    interest (other than those mentioned in Items 8.A.(1) or (2))?





  Yes
  No





B. (1)


   Do you or any related person: as a broker-dealer or registered representative of a broker-dealer, execute
    securities trades for brokerage customers in which advisory client securities
    are sold to or bought from the brokerage customer (agency cross transactions)?





  Yes
  No





(2)


   Do you or any related person: recommend purchase of securities to advisory clients for which you or any related
        person serves as underwriter, general or managing partner, or purchaser representative?





  Yes
  No





(3)


   recommend purchase or sale of securities to advisory clients for which you or any
        related person has any other sales interest (other than the receipt of sales
        commissions as a broker or registered representative of a broker-dealer)?





  Yes
  No





C


   Do you or any related person have discretionary authority to determine the:









(1)


   securities to be bought or sold for a client’s account?






 Yes
 No





(2)


   amount of securities to be bought or sold for a client’s account?






 Yes
 No





(3)


   broker or dealer to be used for a purchase or sale of securities for a client’s account?





  Yes
  No





(4)


   commission rates to be paid to a broker or dealer for a client’s securities
    transactions?





  Yes
  No





D


   If you answer “yes” to C.(3) above, are any of the brokers or dealers related persons?





  Yes
  No





E


   Do you or any related person recommend brokers or dealers to clients?






 Yes
 No





F


   If you answer “yes” to E above, are any of the brokers or dealers related persons?





  Yes
  No





G (1)


   Do you or any related person receive research or other products or services
    other than execution from a broker-dealer or a third party (“soft dollar benefits”) in
    connection with client securities transactions?





  Yes
  No





(2)


   If "yes" to G.(1) above, are all the “soft dollar benefits” you or any
    related persons receive eligible “research or brokerage services” under section
    28(e) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934?





  Yes
  No





H


   Do you or any related person, directly or indirectly, compensate any person for
    client referrals?





  Yes
  No





I


   Do you or any related person, directly or indirectly, receive compensation from any
    person for client referrals?





  Yes
  No




Item 9 Custody


A (1)


   Do you have custody of any advisory clients’ cash or bank accounts?:





  Yes
  No





(2)


   Do you have custody of any advisory clients’ securities?:





  Yes
  No





(2) (a)


   If you checked “yes” to Item 9.A.(1)(a) or (b), what is the approximate amount of client funds and securities for which you have custody:









(2) (b)


   If you checked “yes” to Item 9.A.(1)(a) or (b), what is the total number of clients for which you have custody::









B (1)


   In connection with advisory services you provide to clients, do any of your related persons have
    custody of any of your advisory clients’ cash or bank accounts?:





  Yes
  No





(2)


   In connection with advisory services you provide to clients, do any of your related persons have
        custody of any of your advisory clients’ securities?:





  Yes
  No





(2) (a)


   If you checked “yes” to Item 9.A.(1)(a) or (b), what is the approximate amount of client funds and securities for which your related persons have custody:









(2) (b)


   If you checked “yes” to Item 9.A.(1)(a) or (b), what is the total number of clients for which your related persons have custody::









C


   If you or your related persons have custody of client funds or securities in connection with advisory services you provide to clients, check all the following that apply:









(1)




    A qualified custodian(s) sends account statements at least quarterly to the investors in the pooled investment vehicle(s) you manage.
    




(2)




    An independent public accountant audits annually the pooled investment vehicle(s) that you manage and the audited financial statements are distributed to the investors in the pools.
    




(3)




    An independent public accountant conducts an annual surprise examination of client funds and securities.
    




(4)




    An independent public accountant prepares an internal control report with respect to custodial services when you or your related persons are qualified custodians for client funds and securities.
    




D


   Do you or your related person(s) act as qualified custodians for your clients in connection with advisory services you provide to clients?









(1)


   you act as a qualified custodian





  Yes
  No





(2)


   your related person(s) act as qualified custodian(s)





  Yes
  No





E


   If you are filing your annual updating amendment and you were subject to a surprise examination by an
    independent public accountant during your last fiscal year, provide the date (MM/YYYY) the examination commenced:









F


   If you or your related persons have custody of client funds or securities, how many persons, including,
     but not limited to, you and your related persons, act as qualified custodians for your clients in connection with advisory services you provide to clients?







Item 10 Control Persons


A


   Does any person not named in Item 1.A. or Schedules A, B, or C, directly or indirectly, control your management or policies?





  Yes
  No




Item 11 Disclosure Information





   Do any of the events below involve you or any of your supervised persons?





  Yes
  No





A. (1)


   In the past ten years, have you or any advisory affiliate: been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo contendere (“no contest”) in a
    domestic, foreign, or military court to any felony?





  Yes
  No





A. (2)


   In the past ten years, have you or any advisory affiliate: been charged with any felony?





  Yes
  No





B. (1)


   been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo contendere (“no contest”) in a domestic,
    foreign, or military court to a misdemeanor involving: investments or an
    investment-related business, or any fraud, false statements, or omissions,
    wrongful taking of property, bribery, perjury, forgery, counterfeiting, extortion,
    or a conspiracy to commit any of these offenses?





  Yes
  No





B. (2)


   been charged with a misdemeanor listed in Item 11.B.(1)?





  Yes
  No





C


   Has the SEC or the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) ever:









 (1)


   found you or any advisory affiliate to have made a false statement or omission?





  Yes
  No





 (2)


   found you or any advisory affiliate to have been involved in a violation of SEC
    or CFTC regulations or statutes?





  Yes
  No





 (3)


   found you or any advisory affiliate to have been a cause of an investment-related
    business having its authorization to do business denied, suspended, revoked, or
    restricted?





  Yes
  No





 (4)


   entered an order against you or any advisory affiliate in connection with
    investment-related activity?





  Yes
  No





 (5)


   imposed a civil money penalty on you or any advisory affiliate, or ordered you
    or any advisory affiliate to cease and desist from any activity?





  Yes
  No





D


   Has any other federal regulatory agency, any state regulatory agency, or any foreign
    financial regulatory authority:









 (1)


   ever found you or any advisory affiliate to have made a false statement or
        omission, or been dishonest, unfair, or unethical?





  Yes
  No





 (2)


   ever found you or any advisory affiliate to have been involved in a violation of
        investment-related regulations or statutes?





  Yes
  No





 (3)


   ever found you or any advisory affiliate to have been a cause of an investment-
        related business having its authorization to do business denied, suspended,
        revoked, or restricted?





  Yes
  No





 (4)


   in the past ten years, entered an order against you or any advisory affiliate in
        connection with an investment-related activity?





  Yes
  No





 (5)


   ever denied, suspended, or revoked your or any advisory affiliate’s registration or
        license, or otherwise prevented you or any advisory affiliate, by order,
        from associating with an investment-related business or restricted your or any
        advisory affiliate’s activity?





  Yes
  No





E


   Has any self-regulatory organization or commodities exchange ever:









 (1)


   found you or any advisory affiliate to have made a false statement or omission?





  Yes
  No





 (2)


   found you or any advisory affiliate to have been involved in a violation of its
         rules (other than a violation designated as a “minor rule violation” under a plan
         approved by the SEC)?





  Yes
  No





 (3)


   found you or any advisory affiliate to have been the cause of an investment-
         related business having its authorization to do business denied, suspended,
         revoked, or restricted?





  Yes
  No





 (4)


   disciplined you or any advisory affiliate by expelling or suspending
         you or the advisory affiliate from membership, barring or suspending you or
         the advisory affiliate from association with other members, or otherwise
         restricting your or the advisory affiliate’s activities?





  Yes
  No





F


   Has an authorization to act as an attorney, accountant, or federal contractor granted
    to you or any advisory affiliate ever been revoked or suspended?





  Yes
  No





G


   Are you or any advisory affiliate now the subject of any regulatory proceeding that
    could result in a “yes” answer to any part of Item 11.C., 11.D., or 11.E.?





  Yes
  No





H (1)


   Has any domestic or foreign court:









 (a)


   in the past ten years, enjoined you or any advisory affiliate in connection with any
             investment-related activity?





  Yes
  No





 (b)


   ever found that you or any advisory affiliate were involved in a violation of
             investment-related statutes or regulations?





  Yes
  No





 (c)


   ever dismissed, pursuant to a settlement agreement, an investment-related
             civil action brought against you or any advisory affiliate by a state or foreign
             financial regulatory authority?





  Yes
  No





 (2)


   Are you or any advisory affiliate now the subject of any civil proceeding that could
    result in a “yes” answer to any part of Item 11.H(1)?





  Yes
  No











Elevate your investments
Try it for free















Evanson Asset Management, LLC | Wealthminder











































Evanson Asset Management, LLC


Evanson Asset Management, LLC
(CRD# 135188) is a financial advisory firm headquartered in
, .
They
manage $3,408,053,712 in 4,913 accounts and
serve the financial needs of clients across 37 states (or territories).




Current Firm Details



Evanson Asset Management, LLC



http://www.evansonasset.com







By the Numbers






Total Assets Under Management

3,408
MILLION



Total Number of Accounts

4,913
ACCOUNTS



Average Account Value

$693,681







Compensation Options




Hourly charges
Fixed fees (other than subscription fees)






Advisory Services Offered




Financial planning services
Portfolio management for individuals and/or small businesses








Types of Clients










Registered States






Registered Investment Advisor


Advisors affiliated with a RIA are permitted to work with up to five clients in nearly-all states* without explicit registration. The map below shows states where this firm has explicit registration only.




AL, AZ, CA, CO, CT, DC, DE, FL, GA, IA, ID, IL, IN, KS, LA, MA, MD, MI, MN, MO, MT, NC, NH, NJ, NV, NY, OH, OR, PA, SC, TN, TX, UT, VA, VT, WA, WI






Financial Advisors at Evanson Asset Management, LLC




Showing 1 - 4 of 4 top financial advisors.





1















Jeri L. Crittenden



CRD#:
4682657



3483 Greenfield Place,
Carmel,
CA
93923




93

Wealthminder
score








Jeri Crittenden (CRD# 4682657) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Evanson Asset Management, LLC in Carmel, CA and has 
over 13 years
of experience in the finance industry.






2















Steven E. Evanson



CRD#:
1836990



Carmel,
CA





93

Wealthminder
score








Steven Evanson (CRD# 1836990) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Evanson Asset Management, LLC in Carmel, CA and has 
over 29 years
of experience in the finance industry.






3















Laura J. Kelly



CRD#:
5321371



Carmel,
CA





93

Wealthminder
score








Laura Kelly (CRD# 5321371) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Evanson Asset Management, LLC in Carmel, CA and has 
over 11 years
of experience in the finance industry.






4















David B. Sherwood



CRD#:
5126928



3483 Greenfield Place,
Carmel,
CA
93923




93

Wealthminder
score








David Sherwood (CRD# 5126928) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Evanson Asset Management, LLC in Carmel, CA and has 
over 11 years
of experience in the finance industry.













Our primary data source is public filings of Form ADV as published by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and made available in accordance with the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA). Supplementary information may be provided by listed advisors or their representatives.
Because many firms provide a variety of products or services, an individual may or may not be registered to operate under all services provided by the firm.Do not rely solely on the information on this page. The information may be inaccurate, incomplete or outdated. For the most accurate and up-to-date information, please search for the firm or individual on the SEC site at
http://www.adviserinfo.sec.gov/IAPD/Content/Search/iapd_Search.aspx







Ready to hire a financial advisor?

Get competitive proposals from multiple advisors.

















Request Proposals























Timeout!



You have been idle and will be logged out in

seconds.


Stay Logged In
Log Out Now














﻿





























Commerce Bancshares, Inc. (NASDAQ:CBSH) Expected to Announce Earnings of $0.75 Per Share - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Commerce Bancshares Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Commerce Bancshares Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

Lsb Industries (LXU) vs. CF Industries Holdings (NYSE:CF) Head to Head Survey
Financial Contrast: Arotech Corporation (NASDAQ:ARTX) versus Ultralife Corporation (ULBI)
Commerce Bancshares, Inc. (NASDAQ:CBSH) Expected to Announce Earnings of $0.75 Per Share
Zacks: Analysts Expect AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (MITT) Will Announce Earnings of $0.46 Per Share
Cinemark Holdings (NYSE:CNK) vs. Carmike Cinemas (CKEC) Head to Head Analysis
Analysts Set First Majestic Silver Corp. (NYSE:AG) PT at $15.67
Time Warner (TWX) versus DreamWorks Animation (NASDAQ:DWA) Critical Review
Primoris Services Corporation (PRIM) & Chicago Bridge & Iron Company N.V. (NYSE:CBI) Head-To-Head Contrast
L’Oreal SA (LRLCY) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Brokerages
McDonald’s Corporation (MCD) Given a $170.00 Price Target by J P Morgan Chase & Co Analysts
Kirby Corporation (NYSE:KEX) Issues  Earnings Results, Beats Estimates By $0.01 EPS
CBL & Associates Properties, Inc. (NYSE:CBL) Now Covered by Analysts at Stifel Nicolaus
Hallmark Financial Services, Inc. (NASDAQ:HALL) Raised to “Hold” at Zacks Investment Research
Liberum Capital Reaffirms “Buy” Rating for McBride plc (LON:MCB)
Great Portland Estates Plc (GPOR) Given “Hold” Rating at Numis Securities Ltd
J D Wetherspoon plc (LON:JDW) Receives New Coverage from Analysts at Liberum Capital
Lloyds Banking Group PLC (LON:LLOY) Receives “Buy” Rating from Deutsche Bank AG
Berenberg Bank Raises Hostelworld Group PLC (LON:HSW) Price Target to GBX 270
ITV plc (LON:ITV) PT Lowered to GBX 204
Joules Group PLC (LON:JOUL) Earns “Buy” Rating from Peel Hunt







Commerce Bancshares, Inc. (NASDAQ:CBSH) Expected to Announce Earnings of $0.75 Per Share


					Posted by Lucas Kauffman on Jul 27th, 2017 // No Comments




Wall Street analysts expect that Commerce Bancshares, Inc. (NASDAQ:CBSH) will report earnings of $0.75 per share for the current quarter, according to Zacks. Five analysts have provided estimates for Commerce Bancshares’ earnings. The lowest EPS estimate is $0.73 and the highest is $0.78. Commerce Bancshares reported earnings of $0.65 per share in the same quarter last year, which indicates a positive year-over-year growth rate of 15.4%. The business is scheduled to announce its next quarterly earnings report  on Friday, October 13th.
On average, analysts expect that Commerce Bancshares will report full-year earnings of $2.94 per share for the current financial year, with EPS estimates ranging from $2.90 to $2.99. For the next financial year, analysts expect that the firm will post earnings of $3.10 per share, with EPS estimates ranging from $3.00 to $3.24. Zacks Investment Research’s EPS calculations are an average based on a survey of sell-side analysts that follow Commerce Bancshares.


 Get Commerce Bancshares Inc. alerts:



Commerce Bancshares (NASDAQ:CBSH) last released its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, July 13th. The financial services provider reported $0.75 EPS for the quarter, beating the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $0.70 by $0.05. The company had revenue of $305.89 million for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $309.44 million. Commerce Bancshares had a net margin of 23.79% and a return on equity of 12.01%. The firm’s revenue was up 6.1% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter last year, the business earned $0.70 earnings per share. 





CBSH has been the subject of several research reports. Stephens  reiterated a “hold” rating on shares of Commerce Bancshares in a research report on Monday, April 17th. BidaskClub downgraded shares of Commerce Bancshares from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Saturday, June 24th. Barclays PLC upped their price objective on shares of Commerce Bancshares from $54.00 to $55.00 and gave the stock an “equal weight” rating in a research report on Wednesday, April 19th. Zacks Investment Research downgraded shares of Commerce Bancshares from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Thursday, April 6th. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC  restated a “hold” rating and set a $61.00 price objective on shares of Commerce Bancshares in a research report on Tuesday, April 4th. Three equities research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, five have given a hold rating and one  has given a buy rating to the company. The company presently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $55.00.
In other news, insider Jeffery D. Aberdeen sold 687 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction on Tuesday, July 25th. The shares were sold at an average price of $59.09, for a total transaction of $40,594.83. Following the transaction, the insider now directly owns 40,232 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $2,377,308.88. The transaction was disclosed in a filing with the SEC, which is accessible through the SEC website. Also, Chairman David W. Kemper sold 10,132 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction on Friday, July 21st. The stock was sold at an average price of $57.83, for a total transaction of $585,933.56. Following the transaction, the chairman now directly owns 1,270,757 shares in the company, valued at $73,487,877.31. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. In the last 90 days, insiders have sold 51,811 shares of company stock valued at $2,848,741. 4.30% of the stock is owned by insiders. 
Several institutional investors have recently bought and sold shares of the company. Citizens Financial Group Inc. RI bought a new position in  Commerce Bancshares during the first quarter worth $119,000.  Mosaic Family Wealth LLC boosted its position in  Commerce Bancshares by 2.9% in the first quarter. Mosaic Family Wealth LLC now owns 3,116 shares of the financial services provider’s stock worth $175,000 after buying an additional 89 shares during the period.  Envestnet Asset Management Inc. boosted its position in  Commerce Bancshares by 67.0% in the fourth quarter. Envestnet Asset Management Inc. now owns 3,173 shares of the financial services provider’s stock worth $185,000 after buying an additional 1,273 shares during the period.  Tudor Investment Corp Et Al bought a new position in  Commerce Bancshares during the fourth quarter worth $206,000.  Finally, WFG Advisors LP boosted its position in  Commerce Bancshares by 2.8% in the first quarter. WFG Advisors LP now owns 3,939 shares of the financial services provider’s stock worth $221,000 after buying an additional 109 shares during the period. 62.05% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 
Commerce Bancshares (NASDAQ CBSH) traded up 0.09% during mid-day trading on Monday, reaching $57.83. 331,530 shares of the company traded hands. The firm has a market capitalization of $5.88 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 20.96 and a beta of 0.81. Commerce Bancshares has a 52 week low of $44.27 and a 52 week high of $60.61. The stock’s 50 day moving average price is $57.14 and its 200 day moving average price is $56.41. 
WARNING: This piece was originally  published by Chaffey Breeze and is owned by of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this piece on another site, it was illegally stolen and republished in violation of U.S. and international trademark and copyright legislation. The correct version of this piece can be read at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/27/commerce-bancshares-inc-nasdaqcbsh-expected-to-announce-earnings-of-0-75-per-share.html. 
Commerce Bancshares Company Profile
Commerce Bancshares, Inc is a bank holding company of Commerce Bank (the Bank). The Bank is engaged in general banking business, providing a range of retail, mortgage banking, corporate, investment, trust and asset management products and services to individuals and businesses. The Company operates through three segments: Consumer, Commercial and Wealth.
Get a free copy of the Zacks research report on Commerce Bancshares (CBSH)
For more information about research offerings from Zacks Investment Research, visit Zacks.com






Receive News & Ratings for Commerce Bancshares Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Commerce Bancshares Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 













































Evanson Asset Management® - Investment Risks





















Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds.


Evanson Asset Management®
Specializing in index and passive management.Low cost, fixed annual retainer fees.





back to Home Page




Client Section


Email:



Password:













Updated November 2016
 INVESTMENT RISKS
Abstract:  Investment risk is typically presented to investors in terms of the probable standard deviation of their asset mix.  However, standard deviations are simply a measure of volatility in portfolios.  Investors are more likely to experience risk in their portfolios in terms of price declines in worst cases and how long those declines last and how permanent those declines might be.  This article examines nine general categories of investment risk including price declines, default risk, bank failures, currency risk, macroeconomic risks, moral risk, liquidity risk, capital controls, catastrophe risk and cyber risk.  Risk can arise instantly without warning from multiple factors.

ABOUT INVESTMENT RISKS
All investments entail risk, whether bought and sold on public exchanges or privately.  It is imperative investors understand there is always some risk of a decline in price in any investment or a total loss.  This article summarizes nine categories of risk and is intended to provide a general summary of the risks investors face.  Additional investment risks not listed in this overview exist.  Another article on our website, "Risk and Return", examines the statistics of portfolio risk and "Financial Superstructures" examines non-quantifiable risks to investment markets.
PRICE DECLINES:  This probably is the most common way investors think of risk, the risk of a decline in the value of their investments.  Countless factors can lead to declines in the value of stocks, bonds, mutual funds, real estate, gold, commodities or other investments.  These include but are not limited to earnings disappointments, analyst downgrades, changing industry regulations, declining industry or company competitiveness, credit crises, terrorist attacks, natural disasters, manias, panics and crashes, corporate fraud, exchange rate shifts, market manipulation by major players, cash price manipulations caused by futures contracts, flash crashes from high frequency trading, and "normal" long-term variations in means and variances for asset classes for up to 40 years.  If something is traded, its price will vary and may decline for an extended period longer than an investor may be willing to wait.
DEFAULT RISK:  When an individual bond defaults, at least temporarily, the bond has little or no value.  Often, investors will have to wait for an indefinite period of time and receive less than full value when a refund is finally made if it is made.  Numerous factors can generate bond defaults including excessive leverage, corporate fraud, failing financial conditions for issuers, and declining revenues for debt service.  And, as the collapse of Enron and WorldCom and the 2008 credit crisis dramatically illustrated, ratings companies like Moody's and S&P may not provide investors with accurate advance assessments of credit quality.  Even bond insurance companies can fail.  Defaults by countries on sovereign Treasury debt have been common throughout financial history.  See the book review on our website, "This Time is Different", by Reinhart and Rogoff.  
COUNTERPARTY RISKS:  Counterparties in a variety of securities transactions, including entities involved in the creation and redemption of ETF shares, bond issuers, mortgage issuers, and derivatives issuers, can fail to honor their contractual promises resulting in losses to investors.  Clearing houses which move money between buyers and sellers can also fail.
BANK FAILURES:  It is not uncommon for banks and insurance companies to fail, even old and established ones.  In the 1995, Barings Bank, a venerable 233-year-old English firm, was destroyed by one rogue derivatives trader.  
CURRENCY RISK:  All paper money, often called "fiat" currency because countries declare its value by dictate, has ultimately declined to zero value.  There are no exceptions.  The US dollar for example has lost over 96% of its purchasing power since the Federal Reserve was created in 1913.  The Fed's initial mandate was to maintain stable prices.  Equities and bonds are often called paper assets to distinguish them from real estate, commodities, and precious metals, which are real assets existing in the real world.  Thus, US investors in equities and bonds are essentially buying paper promises in the US dollar, a fiat currency and itself a paper promise.  A rapid devaluation in the U.S. dollar could cause a rapid decline in the value of equities and bonds traded on U.S. exchanges.  
MACROECONOMIC RISK:  Depressions, inflation, and hyperinflation can lower or destroy asset values for a decade or more.  History clearly shows us that they aren't frequent but probably occur more often than most investors expect.  In the 20th century the United States was fortunate to have unquestioned world dominance in industrial production, GDP output, military strength and other important measures yet it suffered from one major depression and one serious bout of inflation both lasting more than a decade.  Timing these events was, of course, impossible.  In addition, central banks and governments often resort to inflationary policies and excessive fiat currency issuance through borrowing and printing. These macroeconomic maneuvers may support or increase the nominal value of investment assets short term but lead to inflation and asset bubbles and crashes later on. 
MORAL RISK:  For want of a better term moral risk applies to countless legal and illegal schemes by which corporations, analysts, investment firms, regulators and others misrepresent material issues, play accounting games, engage in insider trading, or manipulate markets.  Anyone who has followed financial news over the last decade knows that these events are pretty much regular occurrences and anyone who has studied the history of financial markets knows that this has always been the case.  A few recent examples are Enron, Worldcom, Countrywide, and the Goldman scheme where a hedge fund manager directed Goldman to assemble a portfolio of mortgages which had a high probability of failing and Goldman then sold them to its clients.  Ninety-nine percent of the mortgages failed yet due to legal technicalities neither Goldman nor the manager suffered any consequences.  An article elswhere on our website, "Financial Superstructures" examines the many entities involved directly or indirectly in financial markets, the interests of participants within them, and how they influence market returns.
The prospect of big money, typically in the tens of millions or greater today, often draws participants into financial misbehavior.  Typically the consequences for doing so consist of a fine which is often paid by proceeds from the shareholders in the corporation, not the executives and money managers who perpetrate these schemes.  In fact, corporations often buy insurance to protect executives from lawsuits.  The fines paid usually constitute a small percentage of the profits made from the scheme and it is very rare for perpetrators to face jail or prison time.  Fines are typically paid without admitting or denying guilt.  Many observers believe that these fines are simply rationalized as a cost of doing business.
LIQUIDITY RISK:  Far less frequently considered by investors and infrequently mentioned in the financial press is illiquidity.  Illiquidity occurs when securities which could normally be bought and sold on exchanges or in various markets cannot be bought or sold for some period of time.  The market has failed.  The financial industry and financial media don't like to mention illiquidity since the idea of orderly and liquid markets is the backbone of modern capitalism. Sellers and buyers want to assume that they can buy or sell a security if and when they wish to.
All markets for all securities have been subject to trading halts, circuit breakers, and at times been frozen or abandoned by the firms which run exchanges or markets.  Examples include the NYSE, shut down for 5 months in WWI and for several days after 911, the "flash crash" of May 6, 2010, and the abandonment of the auction rate market in February 2008 by Goldman, Blackrock, Nuveen and other auction brokers.  The New York Times (3-28-2012), "Stock Market Flaws Not So Rare, Data Shows", reported that trading had been blocked at least 110 times across the nation's 13 stock exchanges in 2011 and this number had been rising every year since 2007.  Bond markets can be closed but the major risk is that bondholders simply cannot obtain bids and thus their bonds cannot be sold.
CAPITAL CONTROLS:  Economic history clearly demonstrates that governments and financial regulators in the midst of a financial crisis will do pretty much what they want to with private investment assets, businesses, and markets.  Often called "capital controls", these include suspending or setting maximum withdrawals from banks or money markets, curtailing or suspending international bank transfers and foreign exchange transactions, blocking short selling to support equity markets, criminalizing the purchase, ownership, or exportation of precious metals, and fixing a nation's exchange rate rather than letting the market do so.  In September 2008 the SEC halted short selling in financial stocks "to protect investors and markets".  A more accurate description would be that the SEC halted short selling in order to prop up major US investment banks which would have become insolvent had the markets been allowed to operate as they are supposed to and engage in price discovery. 
In 1933, FDR forbade private ownership of gold and effectively devalued the US dollar.  Holders of gold were paid $25/ounce and once all gold in private hands had been collected gold was revalued to $35/ounce, effectively devaluing the value of what the former owners of the gold received by about 40%.  In 1967, the US Congress voted to use all Social Security contributions for current government expenses, putting I.O.U's in place to fund future obligations for Social Security recipients.  Repayment of these I.O.U.'s is dependent upon future US government borrowing, not incurred until the Social Security distributions are needed.  The estimated unfunded liabilities of the Social Security "Trust Fund" are over $75 trillion as of 2016.  Since 2010, Social Security has been cash flow negative with current contributions from current workers failing to match current distributions to Social Security recipients.  And, there is no Social Security "Trust Fund" though that term is used frequently.  The Trust fund is just a reassuring name for non-negotiable I.O.U's to be funded by presumed future US Treasury borrowing.
In 2001 the Argentinian government defaulted on its debt, the largest sovereign default in history, and during the 2008 financial crisis its borrowing costs rose so high that the socialist government nationalized a substantial portion of private pensions to help pay its debts.  As of 2011, at least one US think tank and several Congresspeople have discussed nationalizing US 401-k's in exchange for GRA's, guaranteed retirement accounts, where the US government promises to pay an inflation-adjusted subsidy administered by Social Security.  In August 2013 the Polish government nationalized half of their citizen's private retirement plans.  While unlikely, it could happen to US investors.
CATASTROPHE RISK:  Natural or man-made catastrophes can rock financial markets and securities prices.  Recent examples include 911 and Hurricane Katrina.  Investment companies can use "exigent circumstances" or "force majeure" as a defense against claims of loss by investors.
CYBERRISK:  This is probably the least talked about risk in publically traded securities but it is real, present and growing.  In February 2011, an article appeared reporting that hackers had invaded the Nasdaq trading system (Wall Street Journal, 2-5-11).  Reuters (10-20-11) reported that new details showed the cyber-attack was more serious than previously thought.  It seems hackers installed malicious software that allowed them to spy on confidential information on exchanges and documents circulated amongst boards of directors.  Nasdaq also said that they were not clear how long Nasdaq's system was breached before the attack was discovered and that they are spending about one billion dollars a year on information security.  
Hackers launched six attacks against the European Union's carbon trading systems and stole 50 million pounds (Financial Times, 2-15-2011), and Chinese hackers mounted multiple cyber-attacks against leading oil and gas companies (Financial Times, 2-12-11).  Stewart Baker, former assistant secretary of Homeland Security, said to the Financial Times that the intrusion on the oil and gas companies, "could well be the Chinese government, but I can't say the government would even have to be aware of it."  Hackers used previously known software flaws and did not go to great lengths to cover their tracks researchers said.The US government accused the Chinese of being the world's "most active and persistent" perpetrators of economic spying and also said Russian intelligence agents are conducting extensive spying to collect US economic data and technology (WSJ, 11-3-11).  The article quotes a senior intelligence official, "Cyber has become the great game-changer."  
On 6-18-11 the Financial Times published an article listing the victims of hackers in the prior two weeks; these included the IMF, the CIA, Sony, the Turkish government, Citibank, and the US Senate.  It stated, "...networked computer systems have never been more vulnerable".  Bloomberg Businessweek (7-25-11) examined the worlds of intellectual property theft (through computers), botnet collections with covert outside control across hundreds of thousands of interconnected computers, zero-day "exploits" using existing software from Microsoft and others that is undetectable until it strikes, and high end firms marketing and selling expensive "digital weaponry" to the US government and military.  On 8-4-11, the Financial Times cited McAfee, a US computer security firm, whose research found that cyberespionage operations had penetrated 72 large organizations through just one server in one attack, stealing everything from military secrets to industrial designs and intellectual property from the UN, US and other governments, and 13 defense contractors.  On 10-21-13 the Financial Times reported that SIFMA, a financial industry bond representing some of the biggest banks on Wall Street, says it will push for closer cooperation with the US government following a simulated cyber-attack that mimicked a closure of the US stock market.  A report released in 2013 showed that more than half the world's securities exchanges had fought off cyber-attacks during the prior 12 months and another study found the number of companies reporting cyber-attacks aimed at stealing commercial secrets doubled in 2012 and 2013 compared to the previous financial year.  Cyberespionage is a rapidly growing industry and the problem has become worse as of 2016. 
Based on financial and economic history and on the history of securities prices it is correct to state that the future is unpredictable, that investors may not know critical information until it is too late, that losses may occur in any investment asset class for any number of reasons, and that any investment may lead to the partial or complete loss of principal.  IN SIMPLE TERMS, ANY INVESTMENT IN ANY SECURITY TRADED ON PUBLIC EXCHANGES MAY LOSE AN INVESTOR SOME OR ALL OF THEIR MONEY.  IF YOU DO NOT WANT TO TAKE THIS RISK IN THE PUBLIC MARKETS YOU SHOULD NOT INVEST IN PUBLIC MARKETS.  Each investor must be responsible for soberly and honestly appraising their willingness to take risks.  Of course, there are potential returns for doing so. 












Copyright ©1997-2017 Evanson Asset Management®
 - ALL RIGHTS RESERVED




Site Navigation





